THE BATTLE-DAY OF GERMANTOWN.
A
BY GEORGE LIPPARD, ESQ.
And when servile Fraud stalks through the land, and Genius starves in his cell, while upstart
Imbecility rides abroad in chariots; when man is degenerate, public faith is broken, public honor
violated, then will we wander forth into the awful shadows of the Past, and from the skeletons of the
battle-field evoke the spirits of that giant time, calling upon their forms of unreal majesty for the mighty
secret which made them the man-gods of that era of high deeds and glorious purposes,
the Ghostly
Past
.
From the Abbe De La Mennais
.
Part the First.
THE BATTLE EVE.
The Red Cross in Philadelphia.
It was a sad day for Philadelphia, a sad day for
the nation, when the pomp of British banners and
the gleam of British arms was in her streets and
along her avenucs; when, as far as eye could
reach, was seen the long array of glaring red coats,
with the sunbeams of a clear September day
falling
on helm and cuirass, shining like burnished
gold.
It was a sad and gloomy day for the nation,
when the Congress was forced to flee the old
provincial
town of William Penn, when the tories
paraded
the streets with loud hurrahs, with the
British
lion waving overhead, while the whigs hung
their heads in shame and in despair.
True, the day was calm and bright overhead;
true, the sky was clear, and the nipping air of
autumn
gave freshness to the mind and bloom to the
cheek; true it was, the city was all alive with the
glitter of processions, and the passing to and fro
of vast crowds of people; but the processions were
a dishonor to our soil, the crowds hurried to and
fro to gaze upon the living monuments of the
defeat
of Brandywinethe armed and arrogant
Britishers
filling the streets of Philadelphia.
They came marching along in front of the old
State House, on their way to their barracks in the
Northern Liberties. The scene was full of strange
and startling interest. The roofs of the State
House arose clearly in the autumn air each peak
and cornice, each gable-end and corner, shown in
full and distinct outline, with the trees of
Independence
Square towering greenly in the rear of the
fabric, while up into the clear sky arose the State
House steeple, with its solemn bell of indepen
dence, that but a year ago sent forth the news of
liberty to all the land, swinging a welcome to the
British hosta welcome that sounded like the
funeral knell of new world freedom.
The British in Chesnut Street.
The columns of the army were passing in front
of Independence Hall. Along Chesnut street, as
far as the eye could see, shone the glittering array
of sword and bayonet, with the bright sunshine
falling over the stout forms of the British troopers,
mounted on gallant war steeds, and blazing with
burnished cuirass and polished helm, while
banner
and pennon waved gaily overhead; and there,
treading the streets in all the flush of victory, were
the regiments of British infantry, with the one
bold front of their crimson attire flashing in the
light, with their bayonets rising overhead like a
forest of steel, and with marks of Brandywine
written on many a whiskered face and burly
chest.
And at their head, mounted on a gallant steed,
with the lordlings of his staff around him, rode a
tall and athletic man, with a frame of sinew, and
a calm, placid face, wearing an even smile and
quiet look, seen from beneath the shadow of his
plain chapeau, while his gaudy attire of crimson,
with epaulettes of gold on either shoulder,
announced
Sir William Howe,
[1]
[1]
Some accounts state that Sir William Howe
took possession of Philadelphia in person, while
others state that Lord Cornwallis entered the city
with four regiments of grenadiers.
commander-in-chief
of the invading army.
And as the General glanced around, fixing his
eye proudly upon the British banner, waving from
the State House steeple, as his glance was met by
the windows of Independence Hall, decorated by
the flags of the Britisher, a proud gleam lit up his
calm blue eye; and with the thought of
Brandywine
,
came a vision of the future, speaking
eloquently
of provinces subjugated, rebels overthrown
and liberties crushed.
And then peals of music, uttered by an hundred
bands, filled the street, and startled the silence of
the State House avenues, swelling up to the
heavens
with notes of joy the roll of drum, the shrick
of bugle, and the clash of cymbal mingling in
grand chorus; while the banners waved more
proudly overhead, the spears, the bayonets, and
helmets shone brighter in the light, and between
the peals of music the loud huzzas of the crowd
blackening the sidewalks, looking from the
windows
,
and clinging to the trees, broke gladly upon
the air, as the solemn notes of independence bell
heralded, with an iron tongue, the entrance of the
invaders into the city; the possession of
Philadelphia
by the British.
It was a grand sight to seethe windows
crowded with the forms of beauty, waving scarfs
in the air, aged matrons lifting little children on
high, who clapped their hands with glee, as they
beheld the glimmer of arms and the glitter of
steel, the streets below all crimson with British
uniform, all music and all joy, the side walks
blackened
by crowds of servile tories, who shouted till
their loyal throats were tired Long life to King
Georgeconfusion to Washington, and death to
the rebels!
They trooped through the streets of Philadelphia
on that 26th of September, 1777; just fifteen days
after
the battle-day of Brandywine, they took
possession
with all the pomp of victory; and as the shades
of twilight sank down over the town, they marched
proudly into their barracks, in the Northern
Liberties
.
The Path of the Rebel Chief.
And where was Washington?
Retreating from the forces of Sir William Howe,
along the Schuylkill; retreating with brave men
under his command, men who had dared death in
a thousand shapes, and crimsoned their hands with
the carnage of Brandywine; retreating because his
powder and ammunition were exhausted; because
his soldiers wanted the necessary apparel, while
their hands grasped muskets without lock or flint.
The man of the American army retreated, but
his soul was firm. The American Congress had
deserted Philadelphia, but Washington did not
despair. The British occupied the surrounding
country, their arms shone on every hill; their
banners
toyed in every breeze; yet had George
Washington
resolved to strike another blow for the
freedom
of this fair land.
A Quiet and Lovely Land.
The calm sunlight of an autumnal afternoon was
falling over the quiet valleys, the green plains, and
the rich and rolling woodland of an undulating
tract of country, spreading from the broad bosom
of the Delaware to the hilly shores of the
Schuylkill
,
about seven miles from Philadelphia.
The roofs of an ancient village, extending in one
unbroken line along the great northern road, arose
grey and massive in the sunlight, as each corniced
gable and substantial chimney looked forth from
the shelter of the surrounding trees. There was
an air of quaint and rustic beauty about this
village
.
Its plan was plain and simple, burdened
with no intricate crossings of streets, no
labyrinthine
pathways, no complicated arrangement of
houses. The fabrics of the village were all
situated
on the line of the great northern road, reaching
from the fifth mile stone to the eighth, while a line
of smaller villages extended this Indian file of
houses to the tenth milestone from the city.
The houses were all stamped with marks of the
German origin of their tenants. The high, sloping
roof, the walls of dark grey stone, the porch
before
the door, and the garden in the rear,
blooming
with all the freshness of careful culture,
marked
the tenements of the village, while the heavy
gable-ends and the massive cornices of each roof,
gave each house an appearance of rustic antiquity.
Around the village, on either side, spread fertile
farms, each cultivated like a garden, varied by
orchards
heavy with golden fruit, fields burdened
with the massive shocks of corn, or whitened with
the ripe buckwheat, or embrowned by the
upturning
plough.
The village looked calm and peaceful in the
sunlight, but its plain and simple denizens went
not forth to the field to work on that calm
autumnal
afternoon. The oxen stood idly in the barn
yard, cropping the fragrant hay, the teams stood
unused by the farmer, and the flail was silent
within the barn. A sudden spell seemed to have
come strangely down upon the peaceful denizens
of Gormantown, and that spell was the shadow of
the British banner flung over her fields of white
buckwheat, surmounting the dream-like steeps of
the Wissahikon, waving from Mount Airy, and
floating in the freshning breeze of Chesnut Hill.
The View from Chesnut Hill.
Had you ascended Chesnut Hill on that calm
autumnal afternoon, and gazed over the tract of
country opened to your view, your eye would have
beheld a strange and stirring sight.
Above your head the clear and boundless sky,
its calm azure giving no tokens of the strife of
the morrow; declining in the west, the gorgeous
sun pouring his golden light over the land, his
beams of welcome having no omen of the battle
smoke and mist that shall cloud their light on the
morrow morn.
Gaze on the valley below. Germantown, with
its dark grey tenements, sweeps away to the south,
in one unbroken line; farther on you behold the
glitter of steeples, and the roofs of a large city
they are the steeples and roofs of Philadelphia.
Yon belt of blue is the broad Delaware, and you
dim, dark object beyond the city, blackening the
bosom of the waters, is Fort Mifflin, recently
crected
by General Washington.
Gaze over the fields of Germantown near the
centre of the village. In every field there is the
gleam of arms, on every hill-top there waves a
royal banner, and over hill and plain, toward the
Schuylkill on the one side, and the Delaware on
the other, sweep the white tents of the British
army.
The Haunt of the Rebel.
Now turn your gaze to the north, and to the
northwest. The valley opens before you, and fairer
valley the sun never looked down upon.
Away it sweeps to the northwest, an image of
rustic beauty, here a rich copse of green woodland,
just tinged by autumn, there a brown field, yonder
the Wissahikon, marking its way of light, by a
winding line of silver, in one green spot a village
peeping out from among the trees; a little farther
on, a farmer's dwelling with the massive barn and
the dark, grey hay-stack; on every side life, and
verdure, and cultivation, mingled and crowded
together
,
as though the hand of God, had flung his
richest blessings over the valley, and clothed the
land in verdure and in beauty.
Yonder the valley sweeps away to the
southwest
;
the sun shines over a dense mass of
woodland
rolling away to the blue of the horizon. Mark
that woodland well, try and discern the outline of
every tree, and count the miles as you gaze upon
the prospect.
The distance from Chesnut Hill, is sixteen wea
ry miles, and under that mass of woodland,
beneath
the shadows of those rolling forests, beside
the streams hidden from your eye, in distress
and in want, in defeat and in danger, rendevouz
the bands of a desperate, though gallant army.
It is the Continental army, and they encamp
on the banks of the Skippack. Their
encampment
is sad and still, no peals of music break
upon
the woodland air, no loud hurrahs, no shouts
of arrogant victory. The morrow has a different
tale to tell, for by the first flush of the coming
moon, a meteor will burst over the British Hosts
at Germantown, and fighting for life, for liberty,
will advance the starved soldiers of the
Continental
host.
An Ancient Mansion and a green Lawn.
As the sun went down in his way of glory, on
that 3rd day of October, 1777, his last beams
flung a veil of golden light over the verdure of a
green lawn, that extended from the road near the
head of Germantown, bounded along the village
street by a massive wall of stone, spreading north
and south, over a quarter of a mile, while toward
the east, it swept in all its greenness and beauty,
for the distance of some two hundred yards.
A magnificent mansion arose towering on the
air, a mansion built of grey stone, with a steep
roof, ornamented by heavy cornices, and varied
massive chimneys, with urns of brown stone,
placed
on pedestals of brick at each corner of the
building. This fabric was at once substantial,
strikingly adapted for defence in time of war,
and neat and well-proportioned as regards
architectural
beauty. The walls thick and massive,
were well supplied with windows, the hall door
opened in the centre of the house, facing the road,
and the steps were decorated by two marble Lions
placed on either side, each holding an escutcheon
in its grasp.
Here and there a green tree arose from the
bosom
of the lawn; in the rear of the mansion arose
the brown-stone buildings of the barn, and to the
north the grounds were varied by the rustic
enclosures
of a cattle pen.
This was the mansion of
Chew's House
, and
that green lawn, spreading bright and golden in
he beams of the declining sun, was the
Battle
Field of Germantown
.
One word with regard to the position of the
British on the Eve of Battle.
The Camp of the Britisher.
The left wing of the British army extended
from the centre of the village, more than a mile
below Chew's house, from a point near the old
market house, westward across the Wissahikon,
and toward the Schuylkill. The German
chasseurs
in their heavy uniform, the ponderous caps,
defended by bear skin and steel, the massive sword,
and the cumbrous ornaments of silver, were
stationed
in the front and on the flank of the left
wing.
The right wing swept away towards the
Delaware
,
as far as the Old York Road; each soldier
well armed and accoutred, each dragoon supplied
with his stout war-steed, each cannon with its file
of men, ready for action, and every musket, with
brilliant tube and glittering bayonet, prepared
with its man, `for the keen chase of the rebel route,
whenever the master of the hounds might start the
hunt.'
This wing was defended in the front by a
battalion
of light infantry, and the Queen's American
Rangers, whose handsome accoutrements, uniform
of dark green, varied by ornaments of gold, and
rifles mounted with silver, gleamed gaily from amid
the depths of the greenwood, presenting a
brilliant
contrast to the coarse blue hunting shirt, the
plain rifle, and uncouth woodsman's knife that
characterised the American Riflemen.
In a green field, situated near the Germantown
road, a mile above Chew's house, the banner of
the 40th regiment floated above the tent of Col.
Musgrave, its brave commander, while the canvass
dwellings of the soldiers were scattered around the
field, intermingled with the tents of another
battalion
of light infantry.
Such was the British position at Germantown
a picket at Allan's house, Mount Airy, two
miles above Chew's houseCol. Musgrave's
command
a mile below Allen's housethe main body
two miles below Chew's, somewhere near the old
market houseand this force was backed by four
regiments of British Grenadiers, stationed in the
barracks in the Northern Liberties, Philadelphia.
And this force, exceeding 18000 able-bodied
regulars
,
the Patriot chieftain had resolved to attack
with 8000 Continental troops and 3000 militia,
inferior
in arms, in clothing, and in everything but the
justice of their cause, to the proud soldiers of the
British host.
Night and Fear in Germantown.
Night came down upon Germantown. The
long shadows of the old houses were flung across
the village road, and along the fields; the moon
was up in the clear heavens, the dark grey roofs
were tinted with silver, and glimpses of moonlight
were flung around the massive barns of the village,
yet its peaceful denizens had not yet retired to
rest, after their good old German fashion, at early
candle-light.
There was a strange fear upon the minds of the
villagers. Each porch contained its little circle,
the grey haired grandsire, who had suffered the
bright-cheeked grandchild to glide from his knee,
while he leaned forward, with animated gesture,
conversing with his son in a low whisperthe
blooming mother, the blue-eyed maiden, and the
ruddy-cheeked, flaxen-haired boy, all sharing the
interest of the scene and having but one terrible
topic of discoursethe terror of war.
Could we go back to that quiet autumnal night
on the 3rd of October, in the Year of the Three
Sevens, and stroll along the viilage street of
Germantown
,
we would find much to interest the ear
and attract the eye.
A Stroll into the Olden Time.
We would leave Chew's house behind us, we
would stroll along the village street. We would
note the old time costumes of the villagers, the
men clad in coarse linsey wolsey, voluminous
vests with wide lappels, breeches of buckskin,
stockings and buckled shoes, while the head was
defended by the skimming dish hat; we would
admire
the picturesque costume of the dames and
damsels of Germantown, here and there a young
lady of quality mincing her way in all the glory
f high-heeled shoes, intricate head-dress, and fine
silk gown, all hooped and frilled; there a stately
dame in frock of calico, newly bought and
high-priced
;
but most would we admire the blushing
damsel of the village, her full round cheeks
peeping
from beneath the kerchief thrown lightly around
her rich brown locks, her blue eyes glancing
mischievously
hither and thither, her bust, full
rounded
and swelling with youth and health, enclosed
in the tight bodice, while the rustic petticoat of
brown linsey wolsey, just long enough to disclose
a plump ancle and a little foot, would possess
more attractions for our eyes, than the frock of
calico or gown of silk.
We could stroll along the street of the village,
and listen to the conversation of the villagers.
Every tongue speaks of war, the old man whispers
the word as his grey hairs wave in the moonlight,
the mother murmurs the syllable of terror as the
babe seeks the shelter of her bosom, the boy gaily
shouts the word, as he brandishes the rusted
fowling
piece in the air, and the village beau, seated
beside his sweetheart, mutters that word as the
thought of the British ravisher flashes over his
mind.
The Old Settlers of Germantown.
Strolling from Chew's House, we would pass
the
Bringhursts
, seated on their porch, the
Heiligs
,
the
Peters
, the
Unrods
just opposite
Axe's
Grave Yard
, and the
Lippards
, and the
Johnsons
,
below the grave yard, at the opposite
corners
of the lane leading back to the township line;
we would stroll by the mansion of the
Keysers
,
near the Mnist grave yard; further down we would
pass the
Knorrs
, the
Haines
, the
Pastorius
,
the
Hergeseimers
, the
Engles
, the
Cookes
,
the
Conrads
, the
Watsons
, the
Schffers
and
the hundred other families of Germantown,
desendants
of old German stock, we would pass by, as
seated on the porch in front of the mansion, each
family circle discussed the terrible topic of war,
of bloodshed, of battle and of death.
And at every step, we would meet a British
soldier, strutting by in his coat of crimson, on
every side we would behold the gleam of
British
arms, and our ears would be saluted by the
roll of British drums, beating the tattoo, and the
signal cannon, announcing the hour of repose.
Midnight around Chew's House.
And as midnight gathered over the roofs of the
town, as the baying of the watchdog broke upon
our ears, mingled with the challenge of the
sentinel
,
we would stroll over the lawn of Chew's House,
note the grass growing greenly and freshly, heavy
with dew, and then gazing upon the heavens, our
hearts would ask the question, whether no omen
of blood in the skies, heralded the doom and the
death of the morrow?
Oh, there is something of horror in the
anticipation
of a certain death, when we know as
surely as we know our own existence, that a
coming battle will send scores of souls
shrieking
to their last account, when the green lawn,
now silvered by the moonlight, will be
soddened
with blood, when the ancient mansion, now
rising in the midnight air, like an emblem of ru
ral ease, with its chimneys and its roof sleeping in
the moonbeams, will be a scene of terrible contest
with sword, and ball, and bayonet, when the roof
will smoke with the lodged cannon ball, when the
windows will send their volumes of flame across
the lawn, when all around will be mist and gloom,
grappling foemen, heaps of dying mingled with
the dead, charging legions, and recoiling
squadrons
.
Sunset on the Skippack.
And as the sun went down, on that calm day
of autumn, shooting his level beams thro' the wilds
of the rivulet of the Skippack, there gathered within
the woods, and along the shores of that stream,
a gallant and desperate army, with every steed
ready for the march, with the columns marshalled
for the journey of death, every man with his
knapsack
on his shoulder, with his musket ready for
action, while the broad banner of the Continental
Host drooped heavily over head, its folds rent
and torn by the fight of Brandywine, waving
solemnly in the twilight.
[2]
[2]
The Skippack, the reader will remember, was
some 16 miles from Germantown.
The tents were struck, the camp fires where had
been prepared the hasty supper of the soldier,
were still burning, the neighing of steeds, and the
suppressed rattle of arms, rang thro' the grove
startling the night-bird of the Skippack, when the
flashing light of a decaying flame, burning around
the stump of a great oak, revealed a scene of
strange and terrible interest.
The Last Council.
The flame light fell upon the features of a
gallant
band of heroes, circling round the fire, each
with his war cloak, drooping over his shoulder,
half concealing the uniform of blue and buff, each
with sword by his side, chapeau in hand, ready
to spring upon his war steed neighing in the grove
hard by, at a moment's warning, while every eye
was fixed upon the face of the chieftain who stood
in their midst.
By the soul of Mad Anthony it was a sight that
would have stirred a man's blood to look uponthat
sight of the gallant chieftains of a gallant band,
clustering round the camp fire, in the last and
most solemn council of war, ere they spurred
their steeds forward in the march of death.
The man with the form of majesty, and that
calm, impenetrable face, lighted by the hidden fire
of soul bursting forth ever and again in the glance
of his eye! Had you listened to the murmurs of
the dying on the field of Brandywine you would
have heard the name, that has long since become
a sound of prayer and blessing on the tongues of
nationsthe name of
Washington
. And by his
side was
Greene
, his fine countenance wearing
a shade of serious thought; and there listlessly
thrusting his glittering sword in the embers of
the decaying fire, with his fierce eyes fixed upon
the earth, while his mustachioed lip gave a stern
expression to his face, was the man of Poland and
the Patriot of Brandywine,
Pulaski
, whom it were
tautology to call the brave; there was the
towering
form of
Sullivan
, there was
Conway
, with his
fine face and expressive features, there was
Armstrong
and
Nash
and
Maxwell
and
Stirling
and
Stephens
, all brave men and true, side by side
with the gallant
Smallwood
of Maryland, and the
stalwart
Forman
of Jersey.
And there with his muscular chest, clad in the
close buttoned blue coat, with his fatigue cloak
thrown over his left shoulder, with his hand
resting
on the hilt of his sword, was the hero of
Chadd's Ford, the Commander of the Massacred of
Paoli, the future avenger of Stony Point,
Anthony
Wayne
, whom the soldiers loved in their delight
to name
Mad Anthony
; shouting that name in
the hour of the charge and in the moment of death
like a watchword of terror to the British Army.
Clustered around their Chief, were the aids
decamp
of Washington,
John Marshall
, afterwards
Chief Justice of the States,
Alexander
Hamilton
,
gifted, gallant, and brave, Washington's
counsellor in the hour of peril, his bosom friend
and confidant, all standing in the same circle with
Pickering
and
Lee
, the Captain of the Partizan
Band, with his slight form and swarthy face,
who was on that eventful night detailed for duty
near the Commander-in-chief.
The Plan of the Battle.
And as they stood there clustered round the
person of Washington, in a mild yet decided voice,
the chieftain spoke to them of the plan of the
contemplated
surprise and battle.
It was his object to take the British by surprise.
He intended for the accomplishment of this object,
to attack them at once in the front of each wing,
as well as in the front of the centre; on the flank
and on the rear of each wing. This plan of
operation
would force the American commander to
extend
the continental army over a surface of from
five to seven miles.
In order to make this plan of attack effective, it
would be necessary for the American army to
separate near Skippack, and advance to
Germantown
in four divisions, marching through as many
roads.
General Armstrong with the Pennsylvania
militia
,
3000 strong, was to march down the
Manatawny
road
(now Ridge road,) and traversing the
shores of the Schuylkill, until the beautiful
Wissahikon
poured into its bosom, he was to turn the
left flank of the enemy at
Vandurings
(now
Robinson's
)
Mill, and then advance eastward, along
the bye roads, until two miles distance between this
mill and the Germantown market-house were
accomplished
.
Meanwhile the Militia of Maryland and New
Jersey, were to take up their line of march some
seven or eight miles to the eastward of Armstrong's
position, and over three miles distance from
Germantown
.
They were to march down the Old
York Road, turn the right flank of the enemy, and
attack it in the rear, also entering the town at the
market-house, which was the central point of
operation
for all the divisions.
Between Germantown and Old York Road, at
the distance of near two miles from the village,
extends a road, called Limekiln road. The
divisions
of Greene and Stephens flanked by
McDougal's
Brigade were to take a circuit by this road,
and attack the front of the enemy's right wing.
They also were to enter the town by the
market-house
.
The main body, with which was Washington,
Wayne, and Sullivan, were to advance toward
Germantown by the Great Northern Road,
entering
the town by way of Chesnut Hill, some four
miles distant from the Market-house.
A column of this body was led on by Sullivan
another by Wayne, and Conway's Brigade flanked
the entire force.
While these four divisions advanced, the
division
of Lord Stirling, combined with the brigades
of Maxwell and Nash were to form a corps de
reserve
.
The reader, and the student of American
History
,
has now the plan of battle spread out before
him. In order to take in the full particulars of
this magnificent plan of battle, it may be necessary
to remember the exact nature of the ground around
Germantown.
The Ground around Germantown.
In some places plain and level, in others broken
by ravines, rendered intricate by woods, tangled
by thickets, or traversed by streams, it was in
its most accessible points, and most favorable
aspects
,
broken by enclosures, difficult fences,
massive
stone walls, or other boundary marks of land,
rendering the operation of cavalry at all times
hazardous, and often impossible.
In the vicinage of the town, for near a mile on
either side, the land spread greenly away, in level
fields, still broken by enclosures, and then came
thick woods, steep hills and dark ravines.
The base line of operations was the country
around Skippack Creek, from which point,
Washington
,
like a mighty giant, spread forth the four
arms of his force, clutching the enemy in front,
on his wings and on his rear, all at the same
moment
.
It was a magnificent plan of battle, and success
already seemed to hover round the American
banner
,
followed by a defeat of the British, as terrible as
that of Yorktown, when the red-coat heroes of
Germantown
struck their town Lion from his rock.
As Washington went over the details of battle,
each brave officer and scarred chieftain leaned
forward, taking in every word, with absorbing
interest
,
and then receiving the orders of his com
mander, with the utmost attention and
consideration
.
All was now planned, everything was ready for
the march, each General mounted on his
war-steed
,
rode to the head of his division, and with a
low solemn peal of music, the night-march of
Germantown commenced.
And through the solemn hours of that night,
along the whole valley, on every side, was heard
the half suppressed sound of marching legions,
mingled with the low muttered word of command,
the clank of arms and the neighing of war-steeds
all dim and indistinct, yet terrible to hear.
The farmer sleeping on his humble couch, rushed
to the window of his rustic mansion at the sound,
and while his wife stood beside him, all tremor
and affright, and his little ones clung to his knees
in alarm, he saw with a mingled look of surprise
and fear, the forms of an armed band, some on
horse and some on foot, sweeping through his
green fields, as the dim moonbeams shining
through the gathering mist and gloom, shone over
glittering arms, and dusky banners, all gliding
past, like phantoms of the Spectre Land.
Part the Second.
THE SHROUD OF DEATH.
Ghastly and white,
Through the gloom of the night,
From plain and from health,
Like a shroud of death,
The mist all slowly and sullenly sweeps
A shroud of death for the myriad brave,
Who to-morrow shall find the tombless grave
In mid heaven now a bright spirit weeps;
While sullenly, slowly rises that pall,
Crimson tears for the brave who shall fall,
Crimson tears for the dead without tomb,
Crimson tears for the death and the doom
Crimson tears of an angel's sorrow,
For the havoc, the bloodshed, the carnage and
gloom,
That shall startle the field on the morrow;
And up to the heavens now whitens the mist,
Shrouding the morn with a fiery glare;
Solemn voices now startle the air,
To their sounds of omen you are fain to list:
To listen and tremble, and hold your breath;
While the air is thronging with shapes of death.
On, on over valley and plain the legions tramp,
Scenting the foemen who sleep in their camp;
Now bare the sword from its sheath blood-red,
Now dig the pits for the unwept dead;
Now let the cannon give light to the hour,
And carnage stalk forth in his crimson power.
Lo! on the plain lay myriads gasping for
breath
While the mist it is risingTHE
Shroud of
Death
!
The Daybreak Watch.
Along the porch of an ancient mansion,
surmounting
the height of Mount Airy, strode the
sentinel of the British picket, his tall form
looming
like the figure of a giant in the gathering
mist, while the musquet on his shoulder was
grasped by a hand red with American blood.
He strq ode slowly along the porch, keeping his
lonely watch; now turning to gaze at the dark
shadow of the mansion towering above him, now
fixing his eye along the Germantown road, as it
wound down the hill, on its northward course;
and again he gazed upon the landscape around
him, wrapt in a gathering mist, which chilled his
blood, and rendered all objects around him dim
and indistinct.
Up Rises the Mist.
All around was vague and shadowy. The mist,
with its white wreaths and snowy columns, came
sweeping up on every side, from the bosom of the
Wissahikon, from the depths of a thousand
brooklets
,
over hill and over valley, circled that dense
and gathering exhalation; covering the woods
with its ghastly pall, rolling over the plains, and
winding upward around the height of Mount
Airy, enveloping the cottages opposite the sentinel
in its folds of gloom, and confining the view to a
space of twenty paces from the porch, where he
kept his solitary watchto him, a watch of death.
It is now daybreak, and a strange sound meets
that soldier's ear. It is now daybreak, and his
comrades sleep within the walls of Allen's house,
and a strange, low, murmuring noise, heard from
a great distance, causes him to incline his ear with
attention, and to listen with hushed breath and
parted lips.
The Sound of Distant Waters.
He listens. It is a distant soundvery distant;
like the rush of waters, or the moaning of the
young August storm, bursting into life amid the
ravines of the far-off mountains. It swells on the
earit spreads to the east and to the west: it
strikes the sentinel's heart with a strange fear,
and he shoulders his musquet with a firmer grasp;
and now a merry smile wreathes his lips.
That soundit is the rush of waters: the
Wissahikon
has flooded its banks, and is pouring its
torrent over the meadows, while it rolls onward
towards the Schuylkill. The sentinel smiles at
his discovery, and resumes his measured stride.
He is rightand yet not altogether right. A
stream has burst its banks, but not the
Wissahikon
.
A stream of vengeancedark, wild, and
terrible, vexed by passion, aroused by revenge,
boiling and seething from its unfathomable deeps
is flowing from the north, and on its bosom are
borne men with strong arms and stout hearts,
swelling the turbulence of the waters; while a
tide of sword and bayonet is rushing madly
onward
.
The day is breakingsadly and ghastly
breaking
;
along the veil of mist, that whitens over the
face of nature like a
Shroud of Death for
millions
,
the day is slowly, solemnly, and sadly
breaking, and the sentinel leans idly upon the
bannisters of the porch, relaxes the grasp of his
musquet, inclines his head to one side, and no
longer looks upon the face of nature covered by
mist. He sleeps. The sound not long ago far
off, is now near and mighty in its volume, the
tramp of steeds startles the silence of the road,
suppressed tones are heard, and there is a noise
like the moving of legions.
The First Corse of Germantown.
It grows nearer and nearer! The clatter of
horses' hoofs break along the road above Mount
Airy, and one long blaze of light glares through
the whitening mist, lifting for a moment the pall
of gloom, while a terrible echo arises, shrieking
around the scene. The light blazes through the
mist, and at the very moment the clatter of a
falling
musquet rings along the porch of Allen's house.
The sentinel is dead at his post, his back to the
floor of the porch, his ghastly face upturned, and
his muscular hands vainly clutching at the red
wound between his eyes.
That strange flash, lifting the shroud of mist,
is the first shot of the battle-day of Germantown;
and that corpse stretched along the floor of the
porch, is the first dead man of that day of horror.
And now forms of armed men, with eager faces
and stout forms, with upraised musquets and drawn
swords, break on the scene, and surround Allen's
house; while the voice of Sullivan is heard far
down the road, urging the men of the first column
onward in the march; and then the battle shout
of Anthony Wayne is borne along by the morning
breeze.
The Hunt is Up.
Allen's house is surrounded. The soldiers of
the picket guard rush wildly from their beds, from
the scene of their late carousal by the fire they
rush, and seize their armsbut in vain! A blaze
of fire streams in every window, soldier after
soldier
falls heavily to the floor, the picket guard are
surprised, Allen's house is secured, and the hunt
is up!
Great God, what a scene! The whole road,
farther than eye could see, farther than ear could
hear, crowded by armed men, hurrying over
Chesnut
Hill, hurrying along the valley between
Chesnut
Hill and Mount Airy, sweeping up the hill of
Allen's house, rushing onward in one dense
column
,
with the tall form of Sullivan at their head,
with the war shout of Anthony Wayne heard
from the centre of his column; while riding from
rank to rank, speeding from battalion to battalion,
from column to column, a form of majesty sweeps
by, mounted on a steed of iron grey, waving
encouragement
to the men, while every lip repeats
the whisper, and every heart beats at the sound;
echoed like a word of magic along the lines
There he rideshow grandly his form towers in
the mist; it's Washingtonit's Washington!
and the whole army take up the soundIt is
Washington!
Allen's house was passed, and now the path of
the central body of the army lay along the descent
of the road from Mount Airy, for the space of a
B
mile, until the quarters of Colonel Musgrave's
regiment were reached.
The Tramp of the Legions.
The descent was like the path of a hurricane.
The light of the breaking day, streaming dimly
through mist and gloom, fell over the forms of
the patriot band as they swept down the hill, every
man with his musquet ready for the charge, every
trooper with his sword drawn, every eye fixed
upon the shroud of mist in front of their path, in
the vain effort to gaze upon the position of the
advance
post of the enemy a mile below, every heart
throbbing wildly with the excitement of the
coming
contest, and all prepared for the keen
encounter
,the
fight, hand to hand, foot to foot, the
charge of death, and the sweeping hail of the iron
cannon ball and the leaden bullet.
How it would have made your heart throb, and
beat and throb again, to have stood on that hill of
Mount Airy, and looked upon the legions as they
rushed by.
Sullivan's men have passed, they are down the
hill, and you see them below,rank after rank
disappearing in the pall of the enveloping mist.
The Men of Paoli.
Here they comea band brave and true, a band
with searred faces and sunburnt visages, with
rusted musquets and tattered apparel, yet with
true hearts and stout hands.
In their midst rides that soldier with the tall
form, marked by the broad shoulders and the
muscular
chest; that soldier with the eye of fire and
the voice like thunder; now he waves his sword
on high, now he turns from side to side, speaking
cheerfully to his soldiers, while his steed springs
forward in the race, and every eye beholds him,
and every heart gathers courage at the echo of
his name.
And then his voicehow it rings out upon the
morning air, rising above the clatter of arms and
the tramp of steeds, rising in a mighty shout
On, boys, on! In a moment we'll have them.
On, comrades, onand REMEMBER
Paoli
!
Conway on the March.
And then comes the band with the gallant
Frenchman at their head, the brave Conway, brave
though unfortunate, also rushing wildly by, in the
train of the hunt; while your eye sickens as you
gaze over file after file of brave men, with mean
apparel and meaner arms, some half clad, others
well nigh barefoot, yet treading gaily over the
flinty ground; some with fragments of a coat on
their backs, others without covering for their head,
all marked by wounds, all thinned by hunger and
disease, yet every man of them is firm, every hand
is true, as it clutches the musquet with an eager
grasp.
The Brave Polander.
Ha! That gallant band who came trooping on,
spurring their stout steeds, with wide haunches
and chests of iron, hastily forward, that band with
every face seamed by scars, and darkened by the
thick mustachio, every eye gleaming beneath a
knit brow, every swarthy hand raising the
tremendous
sword on high. They wear the look of
foreigners
,
the manner of men trained to fight in the
exterminating wars of Europe.
And their leader is tall and well-proportioned,
with a dark-hued face, marked by a compressed lip,
rendered fierce by the overhanging mustachio;
his brow is shaded by the trooper's plume, and
his hand grasps the trooper's sword. He speaks
to his men in a foreign tongue, he reminds them
of the well-fought field on the plain of Poland, he
whispers a quick, terrible memento of Brandywine
and Paoli, and the clear word rings from his lips.
Forwarts,brudern,forwarts!
It is the band of Pulaski sweeping past, eager
for the hunt of death, and as they spur their steeds
forward, a terrible confusion arises far ahead.
The Eagle darts upon the Lion.
There is flashing of strange fires through the
folds of mist, lifting the snow-white pall for a
moment
there
is rolling of musquetry, rattling
like the thunderbolt ere it strikesthere is the
tramp of hurrying legions, the far-off shout of the
charging continentals, and the yells and shouts of
the surprised foemen.
Sullivan is upon the camp of the enemy, upon
them with the terror of ball and bayonet. They
rush from their camp, they form hastily across
the road, in front of their baggage, each red-coated
trooper seeks his steed, each footman grasps his
musquet and the loud voice of Musgrave, hurrying
wildly along the line of crimson attire and flashing
bayonets is heard above all other sounds,Form
lads, formfall in thereto your arms, lads, to
your arms.Form, comrades, form!
In vain his shouting, in vain the haste of his men
rushing from their beds, into the very path of the
advancing continentials! The men of Sullivan are
upon them! They sweep on with one bold front,
the forms of the troopers, mounted on their
war-steeds
,
looming through the mist, as with sword
upraised, and battle-shout pealing to the skies,
they lead on the charge of death!
Eternity crowded into a Moment.
A moment of terror, a moment made an age by
suspense! The troopers meet, mid-way in their
charge, horse to horse, sword mingled with sword,
eye glaring in eye, they meet, and as the
earthquake
shock shakes the very ground, steeds recoil
on their haunches, the British strew the road side,
flooding the dust with their blood, and the music
of battle, the fierce music of dying groans and
cries of death, rises up with the fog, startling the
very heavens with its discord!
The hunt is up!
Onboysonrings the voice of Mad
Anthony
oncomradesonand
Remember
Paoli
!
Charge!
sounds the voice of Washington,
shrieking along the line, like the voice of a
mighty
spiritupon themover them! Conway
reechoes
the sound, Sullivan has already made the air
ring with his shout, and now Pulaski, takes up the
cry
ForwartsbrdernForwarts!
The fight of the Avengers.
The British face the bayonets of the advancing
Americans, but in vain! Each bold
backwoodsman
sends his volley of death along the British
line, and then clubbing his musquet rushes wildly
forward, beating the red-coat to the sod with a
blow that cannot be stayed. The British troopers
rush forward in the charge, but ere half the
distance
between them and the American host is
measured, Mad Anthony comes thundering on,
with his Legion of Iron, and as his war-shout
swells loudly above, the red-coats are driven back
by the hurricane force of his charge, the ground
is strewn with the dying, and the red hoofs of the
horse, trample madly over the faces of the dead.
Wayne charges, Pulaski charges, Conway
brings up his men, and Washington rides in the
very glare of the mellay.
A Scene lighted by the Musket-flash.
The fires of the infantry, spreading a sheeted
flame thro' the folds of the mist, light up the scene,
and the never-ceasing clang of sword against
sword, the low muttered shriek of the fallen,
vainly
trying to stop the flow of blood, the wild, dread
yell of the soldier, gazing madly round as he
receives
his death wound, the shout of the charge,
and the involuntary cry of `quarter,' all furnish a
music most dread and horrible, as tho' an infer
nal band, were urging on the work of slaughter
with their notes of fiendish mockery.
That flash of musquetry! What a light it gives
the scene! Above, clouds of white mist and lurid
smoke; around, all hurry, and tramp, and motion,
faces darkened by all the passions of a demon,
glaring madly in the light, blood red hands
upraised
,
meeting foemen grappling in contest,
swords rising and falling, glaring and glittering,
the forms of the wounded, with their faces
buried in the earth, the ghastly dead, all heaped
up in positions of ludicrous mockery of death, along
the roadside!
That flash of musquetry!
The form of Washington is in the centre of the
mellay, the battle glare lighting up his face of
majesty; the stalwart form of Wayne is seen riding
hither and thither, waving a dripping sword in
his good right hand; the figure of Pulaski, dark as
the form of an earth riven spirit of some German
story, breaks on your eye, as, enveloped in mist,
he seems rushing everywhere at the same moment,
fighting in all points of the contest, hurrying his
men onward, and driving the affrighted British
before him, with the terror of his charge.
To Chew's HouseAway!
And Col. Musgravewhere is he?
He shouts the charge to his men, he hurries
hither
and thither, he shouts till he is hoarse, he
fights till his person is red with the blood of his
own men, slain before his very eyes, but all in
vain!
He shouts the word of retreat along his line
Away, my men, away to Chew's House
away!
The retreat commences, and then, indeed, the
hunt of death is up in good earnest.
The British wheel down the Germantown road,
they turn their backs to their foes, they flee
wildly
toward Germantown, leaving their dead and
dying
in their wake, man and horse, they flee, some
scattering their arms by the roadside, others
weakened
by loss of blood, feebly endeavoring to join
the retreat, and then falling dead in the path of
the pursuers, who with one bold front, with one
firm step rush after the British in their flight, ride
down the fleeing ranks, and seatter death along
the hurrying columns.
The fever of bloodshed grows hotter, the chase
grows fearful in interest, the hounds who so often
have worried down the starved Americans, are
now hunted in their turn.
And in the very van of pursuit, his tall form
seen by every soldier, rode George Washington, his
mind strained to a pitch of agony, as the crisis of
the contest approached, and by his side rode Mad
Anthony Wayne, now Mad Anthony indeed, for
his whole appearance was changed, his eye
seemed
turned to a thing of living flame, his face
was begrimed with soot, his sword was red
with blood and his battle-shout rung fiercer on the
air
Over them boysupon themover them, and
Remember Paoli
!
Now, Wayne,
now
shouted Washington
one charge more and we have them!
Forwartsbrudernforwarts! shouted Pulas
ki, as his iron band came thundering on
Forwarts
for
WashingtonForwarts!
The Flight along the Germantown Road
The British leader wheeled his steed for a
moment
and gazed upon his pursuers. All around
was bloodshed, gloom, and death, mist and smoke
above, flame around, and mangled corses below.
With one hoarse shout, he again bade his men
make for Chew's House, and again the dying
scattered along the path looked up, and beheld the
British sweeping madly down the road.
The vanguard of the pursuers had gained the
upper end of Chew's wall, when the remnant of
the British force disappeared in the fog; file after
file of the crimson-coated British were lost to
sight in the mist, and in the very heat and flush of
the chase, the American army was brought to
a halt in front of Chew's wall, each soldier falling
back on his comrade with a sudden recoil
while the officers gazed on each other's faces in
vain inquiry for the cause of this unexpected
delay
.
The fog gathered in dense folds over the heads
of the soldiers, thicker and more dense it gathered
every instant; the enemy was lost to sight in the
direction of Chew's lawn, and a fearful pause of
silence from the din and tumult of bloodshed
ensued
for a single moment.
The Council in the heat of Battle.
Leaning from his steed in front of the gate that
led into Chew's lawn, Washington gazed round
upon the faces of his staff, who circled him on
every side, with each steed recoiling on his
haunches
from the sudden effect of the halt.
Washington was about to speak as he leaned
from his steed, with his sword half lowered in the
misty air, he was about to speak, and ask the
meaning of this sudden disappearance of the
British
,
when a lurid flash, lifted up the fog from the
lawn, and the thunder of musquetry echoed along
the air, quivering among the nooks and corners of
the ancient houses on the opposite side of the
street.
Another moment, and a soldier with face all
crimsoned with blood and darkened by battle
smoke rushed thro' the group clustering around
the horse of Washington, and in a hurried voice
announced that the remnant of the British
Regiment
had thrown themselves into the substantial
stone mansion on the left, and seemed determined
to make good a desperate defence.
What say you, gentlemencried
Washington
shall
we press onward, into the town, and
attack the main body of the enemy at once, or
shall we first drive the enemy from their strong
hold, at this mansion on our left?
The answer of Wayne was short and to the
point. Onwardhe shouted, and his sword
rose in the air, all dripping with blood
Onward
into the townour soldiers are warmed
with the chaseonward, and with another blow,
we have them!
And the gallant Hamilton, the brave Pickering,
the gifted Marshall, echoed the cryOnward
while the hoarse shout of Pulaski rang out in
the airForwartsbrdernForwarts!
It is against every rule of military science
exclaimed General Knox, whose opinion in
council was ever valuable with WashingtonIt
is against every rule of military science, to leave
a fortified stronghold in the rear of an advancing
army. Let us first reduce the mansion on our
left, and then move forward into the centre of the
town!
There was another moment of solemn council
the older officers of the staff united in opinion
with Knox, and with one, quick anxious glance
around the seene of fog and mist, Washington
gave the orders to storm the house.
Storm the House.
And at the word while a steady volume of flame
was flashing from Chew's House, every window
pouring forth its blaze, flashing over the wreath of
mist, the continentals, horse and foot, formed
across the road, to the north of the house, eager
for the signal, which would bid them advance into
the very jaws of death.
The artillery were ranged some three hundred
yards from the mansiontheir cannon being
placed
on a slight elevation, and pointed at the
northwest
corner of the house. This was one of the
grand mistakes of the battle, occasioned by the
density of the fog. Had the cannon been placed in a
proper position, the house would have been
reduced
ere the first warm flush of pursuit was cold in
the cheeks of the soldiers.
But the fog gathered thicker and more densely
around, the soldiers moved like men moving in
the dark, and all was vague, dim, undefined and
uncertain.
All ready for the Banquet of Death.
All was ready for the storm. Here were men with
firebrands ready to rush forward under the cover
of the first volley of musquetry and fire the house;
here were long lines of soldiers grasping their guns
with a quick nervous movement, one foot advanced
in the act of springing forward; yonder were the
cannoniers, their pieces loaded, the linstock in
the hand of one soldier, while another stood ready
with the next charge of ammunition; on every side
was intense suspense and expectation, and heard
above all other sounds, the rattle of the British
musquets, rose like thunder over Chew's lawn, and
seen the brightest of all other sights, the light
of the British guns, streamed red and lurid over
the field, giving a strange brilliancy to the wreaths
of mist above, and columns of armed men below.
The Flag of Truce.
Tradition states that at this moment, when
every
thing was ready for the storm of death, an
expression
of the most intense thought passed over
the impenetrable countenance of Washington.
Every line of his features was marked by thought,
his lip was sternly compressed, and his eye
gathered
a strange brilliancy.
He turned to the east, and bent one long anxious
gaze over the white folds of mist, as though he
would pierce the fog with his glance, and gaze upon
the advancing columns of Greene and Stephen.
He inclined his head to one side of his steed, and
listened for the tramp of their war-horses, but in
vain. He turned towards Germantown; all was
silent in that direction, the main body of the
enemy
were not yet in motion.
And then in a calm voice, he asked for an officer
who would consent to bear a flag of truce to the
enemy. A young and gallant officer of Lee's
Rangers, sprang from his horse, his name Lieut.
Smith, he assumed the snow-white flag held
sacred
by all nations, and, with a single glance at
the Continental array, he advanced to Chew's
House.
In a moment he was lost to sight amid the folds
of the fog, and his way lay over the green lawn for
some two hundred yards. All was still and silent
around him. Tradition states that the fire from
the house ceased for a moment, while Musgrave's
band were silently maturing their plan of desperate
defence. The young soldier advanced along his
lonely path, speeding through the bosom of the fog,
all objects lost to his sight, save the green verdure
of the sod, yet uncrimsoned by blood, and here and
there the trunk of a giant tree looming blackly
through the mist,
The outline of a noble mansion began to dawn
on his eye, first the sloping roof, then the massive
chimneys, then the front of the edifice, and then
its windows, all crowded with soldiers in their
crimson attire, whiskered face appearing above face,
with grisly musket and glittering bayonet, thrust
out upon the air, while with fierce glances, the
hirelings looked forth into the bosom of that fearful
mist, which still, like a death-shroud for millions,
hung over the lawn, and over the chimneys of the
house.
The Honor of the Britisher.
The young officer came steadily on, and now he
stood some thirty paces from the house, waving his
white flag on high, and then with an even step he
advanced toward the hall door. He advanced, but
he never reached that hall door. He was within
the scope of the British soldiers' vision, they could
have almost touched him with an extended
flagstaff
,
when the loud word of command rang through
the house, a volley of fire blazed from every
window
,
and the whole American army saw the fog
lifted from the surface of the lawn, like a vast
curtain
from the scenes of a magnificent theatre,
Slowly and heavily that curtain uprose, and a
hail storm of bullets whistled across the plain, when
the soldiers of the Continental host looked for their
messenger of peace.
They beheld a gallant form in front of the
mansion
.
He seemed making an effort to advance,
and then he tottered to and fro, and his white flag
disappeared for a moment; and the next instant
he fell down like a heavy weight upon the sod,
and a hand trembling with the pulse of death was
raised above his head, waving a white flag in the
air. That flag was stained with blood: it was
the warm blood flowing from the young
Virginian's
heart.
Along the whole American line there rang one
wild yell of horror. Old men raised their
musquets
on high, while the tears gathered in their
eyes; the young soldiers all moved forward with
one sudden step; a wild light blazed in the eye of
Washington; Wayne waved his dripping sword
on high; Pulaski raised his proud form in the
stirrups
,
and gave one meaning glance to his men;
and then, through every rank and file, through
every column and solid square, rang the terrible
words of command, and high above all other
sounds was heard the voice of Washington
Charge
, for your country and for vengeance
CHARGE!
Part the Third.
THE FIGHT AT CHEW'S HOUSE.
Now bare the sword from its sheath blood-red,
'Tis wet with the gore of the massacred dead;
Now raise the sword in the cause most holy
And white the whispers of ghosts break on your ear,
Oh! strike without mercy, or pity, or fear;
Oh! strike for the massuered dead of Paoli!
Revolutionary Song
.
The Flame around the House.
And while the mist gathered thicker and
darker
above, while the lurid columns of battle smoke
waved like a banner overhead, while all around
was dim and indistinct,all objects rendered
larger
and swelled to gigantic proportions by the
action
of the fog,along that green lawn arose the
sound of charging legions, and the blaze of
musquetry
flashing from the windows of Chew's house,
gave a terrible light to the theatre of death.
Again, like a vast curtain, the mist uprose,
again were seen armed men brandishing swords
aloft, or presenting fixed bayonets, or holding
the sure rifle in their unfailing grasp, or yet again
waving torches on high, all rushing madly
forward
,
still in regular columns, file after file,
squadron
after squadrona fierce array of battle and of
death.
The Theatre of Death.
It was a sight worth a score of peaceful years
to see! The dark and heavy pall of battle smoke
overhead, mingled with curling wreaths of
snow-white
mistthe curtain of this theatre of death
the mansion of dark, grey stone, rising massive
and ponderous from the lawn, each peak and
corner
,
each buttress and each angle, shown clearly
by the light of the musquet flashthe green lawn
spreading away from the housethe stage of the
dread theatrecrowded by bands of advancing
men, with arms glittering in the fearful light,
with fierce faces stamped with looks of vengeance,
sweeping forward with one steady step, their eyes
fixed upon the fatal house; while over their heads,
and among their ranks, swept and fell the leaden
bullets of their foes, hissing through the air with
the sound of serpents, or pattering on the sod like
a hailstorm of death.
And while a single brigade, with which was
Washington and Sullivan and Wayne, swept
onward
toward the house, the other troops of the
central division, extending east and west along
the fields, were forced to remain inactive spectators
of this scene of death, while each man vainly
endeavored
to pierce the gloom of the mist and smoke
and observe the course of the terrible fight.
The Forlorn Hope.
Some thirty yards of green lawn now lay
between
the forlorn hope of the advancing Americans
and Chew's house; all became suddenly still and
hushed, and the continentals could hear their own
foot tramp breaking upon the air with a deadened
sound, as they swept onward toward the mansion.
A moment of terrible stillness, and then a
moment
of bloodshed and horror! Like the crash
of thunderbolts meeting in the zenith from distant
points of the heavens, the sound of musquetry
broke over the lawn, and from every window of
Chew's house, from the hall door, and from behind
the chimneys on the roof, rolled the dense columns
of musquet smoke; while on every side, overhead,
around, and beneath, the musquet flash of the
British glared like earth-riven lightning in the
faces of the Americans, and then the mist and
smoke came down like a pall, and for a moment
all was dark as midnight.
A wild yell broke along the American line, and
then the voice of Wayne rung out through the
darkness and the gloomSweep forward under
the cover of the smokesweep forward and storm
the house!
The Terch and the Scaling Ladder.
They came rushing on, the gallant band of
rangers
,
bearing torches in their handsthey came
rushing on, and their path lay over the mangled
bodies of the forlorn hope, scattered along the sod,
in all the ghastliness of wounds and death, and at
their backs advanced with measured step the firm
columns of the continental army, while the air
was heavy with the shriek of wounded men, and
burdened with cries of death.
On they swept, trampling over the faces of the
dead in the darkness and gloom, and then the
terrible
words of command rung out upon the air
Advance and fireadvance and storm the
house!
A volley of sheeted flame arose from the bosom
of the fog along the lawn, the thunder of the
American
musquetry broke upon the air, and the balls
were heard pattering against the walls of the
house, and tearing splinters from the roof.
Another moment, and the pall of mist and battle
smoke is swept aside, revealing a scene that a
thousand words might not describea scene
whose hurry, and motion, and glare, and horror'
the pencil of the artist might in vain essay to
picture.
There were glittering bayonets thrust from the
windows of the house,there were fierce faces,
with stout forms robed in crimson attire, thrust
from every casement,there were bold men
waving
torches on high, rushing around the house;
here a party were piling up combustible
brushwood
and faggots, here a gallant band were
affixing
their scaling ladder to a second story window,
yonder another gallant band were thundering
away at the hall door, with musquet and battle
axe; while along the whole sweep of the wide
lawn poured the fire of the continental host, with
a flash like lightning, yet with uncertain and
ineffectual
aim.
The Fate of the Stormers.
The hand of the soldier with the band gathered
near the combustible pile under a windowthe
hand of the soldier was extended with the blazing
torch, he was about to fire the heap of faggots,
when his shattered arm fell to his side, and a dead
comrade came toppling over his chest.
A soldier near the hall door had been foremost
among that gallant band, the barricades were torn
away, all obstructions well nigh cleared, and he
raised his battle axe to hew the door in fragments,
when the axe fell with a clanging sound upon the
threshold stone, and his comrades caught his
falling
body in their arms, while his severed jaw
hung loosely on his breast.
The party who rushed forward in the endeavor
to scale the window! The ladder was fixed
across the trench dug around Chew's house it was
fixedthe hands of two sturdy continentals held
it firm, and a file of desperate men, headed by a
stalwart backwoodsman, in rough blue shirt and
fur cap, with buck-tail plume, began the ascent of
death.
The foot of the backwoodsman touched the
second
round of the scaling ladder, when he sprang
wildly in the air, over the heads of his comrades,
and fell dead in the narrow trench, with a death
shriek that rang in the ears of all who heard it
for life. A musquet ball had penetrated his skull,
and the red torrent was already streaming over
his forehead, and along his swarthy features.
The Americans again rushed forward to the
house, but it was like rushing into the embrace of
death; again they scaled the windows, again were
they driven back, while the dead bodies of their
comrades littered the trench; again they strode
boldly up to the hall door, and again did soldier
after soldier crimson the threshold stone with his
blood.
The Sound of Marching Legions.
And while the battle swelled fiercest, and the
flame flashing from the windows of Chew's house
was answered by the volley of the continental
brigade, two sounds came sweeping along the air,
one from the south, and the other from the
northwest
.
They were the sounds of marching men
the tread of hurrying legions.
On the summit of a gentle knoll, surrounded by
the officers of his staff, Washington had watched
the progress of the fight around Chew's mansion,
not more than two hundred yards distant.
Washington and his Terrible Suspense.
With his calm and impenetrable face, wearing
an unmoved expression, he had seen the
continentals
disappear in the folds of the fog, he had seen
file after file marching on their way of death, he
had heard the roar of contest, the shrieks of the
wounded and the yells of the dying had startled his
ear, but not a muscle of his countenance moved
not a feature trembled.
But when those mingling sounds of marching
men came pealing on his ear, he inclined slightly
to one side of his steed and then to the other, as
if in the effort to catch the slightest sound, his
lips were fixedly compressed and his eye flashed
and flashed again, until it seemed turning to a
thing of living flame.
The Horseman and his Message.
The sounds grew near, and nearer! A
horseman
approached from the direction of
Germantown
,
his steed was well nigh exhausted and the
rider swayed heavily to and fro in the saddle.
The horse came thundering up the knoll, and a
man with a ghastly face, spotted with blood,
leaned
from the saddles and shrieked forth, as he
panted
for breath
Generalthey are in motionthey are
marching through GermantownKniphausen,
Agnew, and Grey, they will be on you in a
moment
,
andCornwallisCornwallis is sweeping
from Philadelphia.
The word had not passed his lips, when he fell
from his steed a ghastly corpse.
Another messenger stood by the side of
Washington
his
steed was also exhausted, and his face
was covered with dust, but not with blood. He
panted for breath as he shrieked forth an
exclamation
of joy:
Greene is marching from the northwest
attracted
by the fire in this quarter, he has deviated
from his path, and will be with you in a
moment
!
And as he spoke, the forms of a vast body of
men began to move, dim and indistinctly, from
the folds of the fog on the northwest, and then
the glare of crimson was seen appearing from the
bosom of the mist on the south, as a long column
of red coated soldiers, began to break slowly on
the vision of Washington and his men.
Germantown Aroused by distant Thunder.
Turn we for a moment to Germantown.
The first glimpse of day, flung a grey and solemn
light over the tenements of Germantown, when
the sound of distant thunder, aroused the startled
inhabitants from their beds, and sent them
hurriedly
into the street, where they crowded in small
groups, each one asking his neighbor for the
explanation
of this sudden alarm, and each one
inclining
his ear to the north, listening intently to
those faint yet terrible sounds, thundering along
the northern horizon.
The crowded moments of that eventful morn,
wore slowly on, and ere the day was yet light,
the streets of Germantown were all in motion,
crowds of anxious men were hurrying hither and
thither, mothers stood on the rustic porch, gather
ing their babes in a closer embrace, and old men,
risen in haste from their beds, clasped their
withered hands and lifted their eyes to heaven in
muttered prayer, as their ears were startled by
the sounds of omen pealing from the north.
The British leaders were yet asleep, the
soldiers
of the camp, it is true, had risen hastily from
their couches, and along the entire line of the
British encampment, ran a vague yet terrible
rumor
of coming battle and of sudden death, yet the
generals in command slept soundly in their beds,
visited, it may be, with pleasant dreams of
massacred
rebels, fancy pictures of the night of Paoli,
mingled with a graphic sketch of the head of
Washington adorning one of the gates of London,
while the grim visage of mad Anthony Wayne
figured on another.
The Message for General Grey.
The footstep of a booted soldier rang along the
village street, near the market-house, in the centre
of the village, and presently a tall grenadier strode
up the stone steps of an ancient mansion, spoke a
hurried word to the sentinel at the door, and then
hastily entered the house. In a moment he stood
beside the couch of General Grey, he roused him
with a rude shake of his vigorous hands, and the
startled Britisher sprang up as hastily in his bed
as though he had been dreaming a dream of the
terrible night of Paoli.
Your Excellencythe Rebels are upon us!
cried the grenadierthey have driven in our
outposts, they surround us on every side
We must fight it outaway to Kniphausen
away to Agnew
They are already in the field, and the men are
about advancing to Chew's House.
But a moment elapsed, and the British general
with his attire flung hastily over his person, rode
to the head of his command, and while
Kniphausen
,
gay with the laurels of Brandywine, rode
from rank to rank, speaking encouragement to his
soldiers in his broken dialect, the British army
moved forward over the fields and along the
solitary streets of Germantown towards Chew's
House.
The brilliant front of the British extended in
a flashing array of crimson, over the fields, along
the streets, and through the wreaths of mist on
every side shone the glitter of bayonets, on every
hand was heard the terrible tramp of 16,000 men
sweeping onward, toward the field of battle, their
swords eager for American blood.
To Chew's House:
As the column under command of General
Agnew swept through the village street, every
man noted the strange silence that seemed to have
come down upon the village like a spell. The
houses were all carefully closed, as though they
had not been inhabited for years, the windows
were barricaded, and the earthquake tramp of the
vast body of soldiers was the only sound that
disturbed
the silence of the town.
Not a single inhabitant was seen. Some had
fled wildly to the fields, others had hastened with
the strange and fearful curiocity of our nature to
the very verge of the battle of Chew's House, and
in the cellars of the houses gathered many a wild
and affrighted group, mothers holding their little
children to their breasts, old men whose eyes were
vacant with enfeebled intellect asking wildly the
cause of all this alarm, while many a fair-cheeked
maiden turned pale with horror, as the thunder of
the cannon seemed to shake the very earth.
The Legend of General Agnew.
A singular legend is told in relation to General
Agnew. Tradition states, that on that eventful
morn, as he led the troops onward through the
town, a singular change was noted in his
appearance
.
His cheeks were pale as death, his
compressed
lip trembled with a nervous movement, and
his eyes glared hither and thither with a strange
wild glance.
He turned to the aid-de-camp at his side, and
said with a ghastly smile, that this day's work
would be his last on earth, that this battle-field
would be the last he should fight, that it
became
him to look well at the gallant array of war,
and share in the thickest of the fight, for in war
and in fight should his hand this day strike its last
and dying blow.
The Strange Old Man.
And tradition states that as his column neared
the Mnisht grave-yard,
[3]
[3]
Adjoining the dwelling of Mr. Samuel Keyser,
about three-fourths of a mile below Chew's House.
a man of strange and
wild aspect, clad in the skins of wild beasts, with
scarred face and unshaven beard, came leaping
over the grave-yard wall, and asked a soldier of
the British column, with an idiotic smile, whether
that gallant officer, riding at the head of the men,
was the brave General Grey, who had so nobly
routed the rebels at Paoli?
The soldier replied with a peevish oath that
yonder officer was General Grey, and he pointed
to General Agnew as he spoke.
The strange man said never a word, but smiled
with a satisfied look, and sprang over the
grave-yard
wall, and as he sprang, a bullet whistled past
the ear of General Agnew, and a thin column of
blue smoke wound upward from the grave-vard
wall.
The General turned and smiled. His officers
would have searched the grave-yard for the author
of the shot, but a sound broke on their ears from
the road above, and presently the clatter of hoofs
and the clamor of swords came thundering through
the mist.
The Contest in the Village Street.
And in a moment the voice of Sullivan was
heard
Charge
upon the Britishers
charge
them home!
And the steeds of the American cavalry came
thundering on, sweeping down the hill with one
wild movement, rushing into the very centre of
the enemy's column, each trooper unhorsing his
man, while a thousand fierce shouts mingled in
wild chorus, and the infantry advanced with fixed
bayonets, speeding steadily onward until they had
driven back their foes with the force of their solid
charge.
And along that solitary street of Germantown
swelled the din and terror of battle, there grappled
with the fierce grasp of vengeance and of death
the columns of contending foemen, there rode
the troopers of the opposite armies, their swords
mingling, their horses meeting breast to breast
in the terrible shock of this fierce tournament;
there shrieked the wounded and dying, while
above the heads of the combatants waved the
white folds of mist, mingled with the murky battle
smoke.
Sullivan charged bravely, Wayne came nobly
to his rescue, Pulaski scattered confusion into
the ranks of the enemy, and the Americans had
been masters of the field were it not for a fresh
disaster at Chew's House, combined with the
mistakes
of the various bodies of the Continentals, who
were unable to discern friend from foe in the
density of the fog.
Chew's House again.
Meanwhile the contest thickened around Chew's
house; the division of Greene, united with the
central
body of the American army, were engaged
with the left wing of the British army, under
Kniphausen, Grant, and Grey, while Sullivan led
forward into the town a portion of the advance
column of his division.
Tradition has brought down to our times a
fearful
account of the carnage and bloodshed of the
fight around Chew's house at this moment, when
the British army to the south and the Americans
to the north, advanced in the terrible charge, under
the cover of the mist and gloom.
It was like fighting in the dark. The
Americans
advanced column after column, they drove
back the British columns with a line of bristling
bayonets, while the fire of the backwoodsmen
rattled
a death hail over the field; but it was all in
vain! That gloomy miset hung over their heads,
concealing their foes from sight, or investing the
forms of their friends with a doubtful gloom, that
caused them to be mistaken for Britishers in the
fierce mellay; all was dim, undefined and indistinct.
The Adventure of Washington.
It was at this moment that a fierce resolution
came over the mind of Washington. All around
him was mist and gloom, he saw his men
disappear
within the fog, toward Chew's house, but he
knew not whether their charge was greeted with
success or defeat; he heard the tread of hurrying
legions, the thunder of the cannon, the rattle of
the musketry broke on his ear, mingled with the
shrieks of the wounded and the groans of the
dying
;
and all the terrible panorama of a battle field,
the smoke, the gloom and the mist, passed vividly
before his eyes, but still he knew not the cause of
the impregnability of Chew's house. He
determined
to advance toward the house, and examine
its position in person. He turned to the officers
of his staffFollow me who lists! he cried,
and in a moment, his steed of iron grey was
careering
over the sod, littered with ghastly corses,
while the air overhead was alive with the music
of bullets, and the earth beneath was flung against
the war-steed's flanks by the cannon ball.
Followed by Hamilton, by Pickering, by
Marshall, and by Lee, of the gallant legion, Wash
ington rode forward, and speeding between the
fires of the opposing armies, approached the
house.
The Path of Terror.
The scene was awful, At each step a dead man,
with a ghastly face turned upward, little pools of
blood crimsoning the lawn, torn fragments of
attire
scattered over the sod, on every side hurrying
bodies of marching foemen, while, terrible and
unremitting, the fire flashing from the windows of
Chew's House, throws a lurid glare over the
fearful
scene.
Washington dashed over the lawn, he
approached
the house, and every man of his train held his
breath. Bullets were whistling over their heads,
cannon balls playing round their horses' feet, yet
their leader kept on his way of terror. A single
glance at the house, with its vollies of flame
flashing
from every window, and he turned to the
north, to regain the American lines, but the fog
and smoke gathered round him, and he found his
horse entangled amid the enclosures of the
cattle-pen
to the north of the mansion.
Washington between two Fires.
Leap your horsescried Washington to the
brave men around himLeap your horses and
save yourselves! And in a moment, amid the
mist and gloom, his officers leaped the northern
enclosure of the cattle-pen, and rode forward to
the American line, scarcely able to discover their
path, in the dense gloom that gathered around
them. They reached the American lines, and to
their horror, discovered that Washington was not
among them. He had not leaped the fence of the
cattle-pen, because with the feeling of a true
veteran
,
he was afraid of injuring his gallant steed,
by this leap in the dark.
While the officers of the staff were speeding to
the American line, Washington turned his steed
to the south, he determined to repass the house,
strike to the north east, and then facing the fires
of both armies, regain the Continental army.
He rose proudly in the stirrups, he placed
his hand gently on the neck of his steed, he
glaneed
proudly around him, and then the noble horse
sprang forward with a sudden leap, and the mist
rising for a moment disclosed the form of
Washington
,
to the vision of the opposing armies.
Part the Fourth.
THE FALL OF THE BANNER OF THE STARS.
What seest thou now, Gonzales?
I look from the oriel windowI see a forest of glittering steel, rising in the light, with the snow-flakes of waving
plumes flaunting with the sunbeams! Our men advancethe banner of the stars is borne aloft, onward and on it
sweeps, like a mighty bird; and now the foemen waver, they recoilthey
They fly! Great Godthey fly!
Nono!oh, moment of horror!the banner of the stars is lost!the flag of blood-red hue rises in the light
the foemen advanceI dare not look upon the scene
Look again, good Gonzaleslook, I beseech theewhat seest thou now?
I see a desolated field, strewn with dead carcases and broken armsthe banner of the stars is trampled in the
dustall is lost, and yet not ALL!
Washington in Danger.
The form of the Chieftain rose through the
smoke and gloom of battle, in all its magnificence
of proportion, and majesty of bearing, as speeding
between two opposing fires, with a proud glance
over the battle-field, he retraced his path of death,
and rode fearlessly toward the American army.
He was now in front of Chew's House, he was
passing through the very sweep of the terrible
fires, belching from every window, the bullets
whistled around him, and on every hand was
confusion
,
and darkness, made more fearful by the
glare of musquetry, and the lightning-flash of
cannon
.
He is now in front of Chew's House! Another
moment and the Man of the Army may fall from
his steed riddled by a thousand bullets, a single
moment and his corse may be added to the heaps
of dead piled along the lawn in all the ghastliness
of death, another moment and the Continentals
may be without a leader, the British without
their most determined foe.
His form is enrapt in mist, he is lost to sight,
he again emerges into light, he passes the houses
and sweeps away toward the Continental army.
He passes the house, and as he speeds onward
toward the American lines, a proud gleam lights
up his eye, and a prouder smile wreaths his
determined
lips. The American army is yet safe,
they are in the path to victoryhe exclaims, as
he rejoins the officers of his staff, within the
American linesHad I but intelligence of
Armsstrong
in the Westof Smallwood and Forman
in the East, with one bold effort, we might carry
the field!
But no intelligeuce of Smallwood or Forman
cameArmstrong's movements were all unknown
Stephens, who flanked the right wing of Greene,
was not heard from, nor could any one give
information
concerning his position.
And as the battle draws to a crisis around Chew's
House, as the British and Americans are disputing
the possession of the lawn now flooded with blood,
let me for a moment turn aside from the path of
regular history, and notice some of the legends
of the battle field, brought down to our times by
the hoary survivors of the Revolution.
The Unknown Form.
And while the battle swelled fiercest, while the
armies traversed that green lawn in the hurry of
contest, along the blood-stained sward, with calm
manner and even step, strode an unknown form,
passing unfearingly over the field, passing amid
smoke and mist and gloom, while the wounded
fell shrieking at his feet, and the faces of the dead
met his gaze on every side.
It was the form of an aged man, with grey hairs
streaming over his shoulders, an aged man with
a mild yet fearless countenance, with a tall and
impressive figure, clad neither in the glaring dress
of the Britisher, or the hunting-shirt of the
Continental
,
but in the plain attire of drab cloth, the
simple coat, vest with wide lappels, small clothes
and stockings, that mark the believers of the
Quaker
faith.
He was a Friend. Who he was, or what was
his name, whence he came, or whither he went,
no one could tell, and tradition still remains
silent
.
But along that field, he was seen gliding amid
the heat and glare of battle. Shrieked the
wounded
soldier for a cup of water, it was his hand that
brought it from the well, on the verge of Chew's
wall. Extended along the sward, with their
ghastly faces trembling with the spasmodic throe
of insupportable pain, the dying raised themselves
piteously on their trembling hands, and in broken
tones asked for relief, or in the wildness of delirium
spoke of their far-off homes, whispered a message
to their wives or little ones, or besought the
blessing
of their grey-haired sires.
The Disciple of Jesus.
It was the Quaker, the unknown and mysterious Friend who was seen unarmed save with the Faith
of God, undefended save by the Armor of Heaven
kneeling on the sod, whispering words of comfort
to the dying, and pointing with his uplifted hand
to a home beyond the skies, where battle nor
wrong nor death ever came.
Around Chew's House and over the lawn he
sped on his message of mercy. There was fear
and terror around him, the earth beneath his
measured
footsteps trembled, and the air was heavy
with death, but he trembled not, nor quailed, nor
turned back from his errand of mercy.
Now seen in the thickest of the fight, the
soldiers
rushing on their paths of blood, started back
as they beheld his mild and peaceful figure. Some
deemed him a thing of air, some more superstitious,
thought they beheld a spirit, not one offered to
molest or harm the Messenger of Peace.
It was a sight worth all the ages of controversial
Divinity to see, this plain Quaker going forth with
the faith of that Saviour, whose name has ever
been most foully blasphemed by those who called
themselves his friends, going forth with the faith
of Jesus in his heart, speaking comfort to the
dying
,
binding up the gashes of the wounded, or yet
again striding boldly into the fight and rescuing
with his own unarmed hands the prostrate soldier
from the attack of his conquering foe.
Honor to the Disciple.
Blessings on his name, the humble Quaker, for
this deed which sanctifies humanity, and makes
us dream of men of mortal mould raised up to the
majesty of Gods. His name is not written down,
his history is all unknown, but when the broad
books of the unknown world are bared to the eyes
of a congregated universe, then will that name
shine brighter and lighten up with a holier gleam
than the name of any Controversial Divine or
loud-mouthed hireling that ever disgraced
Christianity
or blasphemed the name of Jesus.
The Scene Within Chew's House.
Within Chew's House this was the scene:
Every room crowded with soldiers in their
glaring crimson attire, the old hall thronged by
armed men, all stained with blood and begrimed
with battle smoke, the stair-way trembling beneath
the tread of soldiers bearing ammunition to the
upper rooms, while every board of the floor, every
step of the stair-case bore its ghastly burden of
dying and dead, the air was pestilent with the
smell of powder, the walls trembled beneath the
shock of battle, and thick volumes of smoke rolling
from the lower rooms, wound through the doors,
into the old hall, and up the stairway, enveloping
all objects in a pall of gloom, that now shifted
aside, and again came down upon the forms of the
Britishers like dark night.
Let us ascend the stairway. Tread carefully,
or your foot will trample on the face of that dead
soldier; ascend the staircase with a cautious step,
or you will lose your way in the battle smoke.
The house trembles to its foundation, one
volley
of musquetry after another breaks on your
ear, and all around is noise and confusion;
nothing
seen but armed men hurrying to and fro,
nothing heard but the thunder of the fight.
We gain the top of the stairwaywe have
mounted over the piles of deadwe pass along
the entrywe enter the room on the right, tacing
toward the lawn.
A scene of startling interest opens to our sight.
At each window are arranged files of men, who,
with faces all blood stained and begrimed, are
sending their musquet shots along the lawn; at
each window the floor is stained with a pool of
blood, and the bodies of the dead are dragged
away by the strong hands of their comrades, who
fill their places almost as soon as they receive
their death wound. The walls are rent by cannon
balls, and torn by bullets, and the very air seems
ringing with the carnival shouts of old Death,
rejoicing
in the midst of demons.
The Drop from the Ceiling.
Near a window in this room clustered a gallant
band of British officers, who gave the word to the
men, directed the dead to be taken from the floor,
or gazed out upon the lawn in the endeavor to
pierce the gloom of the contest.
Some were young and handsome officers, others
were veterans who had mowed their way through
many a fight, and all were begrimed with the
blood and smoke of battle. Their gaudy coats were
rent, the epaulette was torn from one shoulder by
the bullet, the plume from the helm of another
and a third fell in his comrades' arms, as he
received
the ball in his heart.
While they stood gazing from the window, a
singular incident occurred.
A young officer, standing in the midst of his
comrades, felt something drop from the ceiling,
and trickle down his cheek.
The fight was fierce and bloody in the attic
overhead. They could hear the cannon balls
tearing
shingles from the roofthey could hear the
low, deep groans of the dying.
Another drop fell from the ceilinganother and
another.
It is blood! cried his comrades, and a laugh
went round the group.
Is it blood?
Drop after drop fell from the ceiling; and in a
moment a thin liquid stream came trickling down,
and pattered upon the blood-stained floor.
The young officer reached forth his hand, he
held it extended beneath the falling stream: he
applied it to his lips.
Not blood, but wine! he shouted. Good
old Madeira wine!
The group gathered round the young officer in
wonder. It was winegood old winethat was
dripping from the ceiling. In a few moments the
young officer, rushing through the gloom and
confusion
of the stairway, had ransacked the attic,
and discovered under the eaves of the roof, between
the rafters and the floor, some three dozen bottles
of old Madeira wine, placed there for safe-keeping
some score of years before the battle. These
bottles
were soon drawn from their resting-place, and
the eyes of the group in the room below were
presently
astonished by the vision of the ancient
bottles
,
all hung with cobwebs, and with the sealed
corks covered with dust.
In a moment the necks were struck off some
half-dozen bottles, and while the fire poured from
the window along the lawn, while cries, and
shrieks, and groans, broke on the air; while the
smoke came rolling in the window, now in folds
of midnight blackness, and now turned to lurid
red by the glare of cannon; while the terror and
gloom of battle arose around them, the group of
officers poured the wine in an ancient goblet,
discovered
in a closet of the mansion,they filled it
brimming full with wine, and drank a royal health
to the good King George!
The Debauch of Death.
They drank and drank again, until their eyes
sparkled, and their lips grew wild with loyal
words, and their thirst for bloodthe blood of the
rebelswas excited to madness. Again and again
were the soldiers shot down at the window, again
were their places filled, and again and again the
goblet went round from lip to lip, and the old
wine was poured forth like water, in healths to
the good King George!
And as they drank, one by one, the soldiers
were swept away from the windows, until at the
last the officers stood exposed to the blaze of the
American fire, flashing from the green lawn.
Health to King GeorgeDeath to the rebels!
The shout arose from the lips of a grey-haired
veteran, and he fell to the floor, a mangled corse.
The arm that raised the goblet was shattered at
the elbow by one musket ball, as another
penetrated
his brain.
The goblet was seized by another hand, and the
revel grew loud and wild. The sparkling wine
was poured forth like water, healths were drank,
hurrahs were shouted, andanother officer
measured
his length on the floor. He had received
his ball of death.
There was something of ludicrous horror in the
scene.
Those sounds of revel and bacchanalian uproar,
breaking on the air, amid the intervalsthe short
and terrible intervals of battlethose faces flushed
by wine, and agitated by all the madness of the
moment, turned from one side to another, each lip
wearing a ghastly smile, each eye glaring from its
socket, while each voice echoed the drunken shout
and the fierce hurrah.
Another officer fell wounded, and another, and
yet another. The young officer who had first
discovered
the wine alone remained.
He glanced round upon his wounded and dying
comrades, he looked vacantly in the faces of the
dead, he gazed around upon the terror and
confusion
of the scene, and then he seized the goblet,
filled it brimming-full with wine, and raised it to
his lips.
His lip touched the edge of the goblet, his face
was reflected in the quivering wavelets of the
wine, his eyes rolled wildly to and fro, and then
a musket shot pealed through the window. The
officer glared around with a terrible glance, and
then the warm blood, spouting from the wound
between his eyebrows, fell drop by drop into the
goblet, and mingled with the wavelets of the ruby
wine.
And then there was a wild shout, and a heavy
body toppled to the floor; and so ended the
debauch
of death.
The Movements of Smallwood, Forman,
and Armstrong.
Let us for a moment notice the movements of
the divisions of Washington's army, and then
return
to the principal battle ground at Chew's
house.
The movements of the divisions of Smallwood
and Forman are, to this day, enveloped in
mystery
.
They came in view of the enemy, but the
density of the mist prevented them from
effectually
engaging with the British.
Armstrong came marching down the
Manatawny
road, until the quiet Wissahikon
dawned
in the eyes of his men; but after this
moment
,
his march is also enwrapt in mystery.
Some reports say that he actually engaged with
the Hessian division of the enemy, others state
that the alarm of the Americans retreating from
Chew's house reached his ear, as the vanguard of
his command entered Germantown, near the
market-house
,
and commenced firing upon the
chasseurs
who flanked the left wing of the British
army.
However this may be, yet tradition has brought
down to our times a terrible legend connected with
the retreat of Armstrong's division. The theatre
of this legend was the quiet Wissahikon, and this
is the story of ancient tradition.
The Wissahikon.
It is a poem of everlasting beauty and a dream
of magnificencethe world-hidden,
wood-embowered
Wissahikon. Its pure waters break forever
in ripples of silver around the base of colossal
rocks, or sweep murmuringly on, over beds of
pebbled
flints, or spread into calm and mirror-like
lakes, with shores of verdure, surmounted by green
hills, rolling away in waves of forest trees, or
spreading quietly in the fierce light of the summer
sun, with the tired cattle grouped beneath the lofty
oaks.
It is a poem of beautywhere the breeze
mourns its requiem through the tall pines; where
the silver waters send up their voices of joy; where
calmness, and quiet, and intense solitude awe the
soul, and fill the heart with bright thoughts and
golden dreams, woven in the luxury of the
summer
hour.
From the moment your eyes first drink in the
gladness of its waters, as they pour into the
Schuylkill, seven miles from Philadelphia, until
you behold it winding its thread of silver along
the meadows of Whitemarsh, many miles above,
it is all beauty, all dream, all magnificence.
It breaks on your eye, pouring into the
Schuylkill
,
a calm lake, with an ancient and picturesque
mill
[4]
[4]
Formerly Vanduring's, now Robinson's mill.
in the foreground; a calm lake, buried in the
depths of towering steeps, that rise almost
perpendicularly
on either side, casting a shadow of gloom
over the water, while each steep is green with
brushwood, each rocky cleft magnificent with the
towering oak, the sombre pine, or the leafy
chesnut
.
This glen is passed; then come quiet hilly shores,
sloping away to the south in pleasant undulations,
while on the north arise frowning steeps, and then
your mind is awed by tremendous hills on either
side, creating one immense solitude; rugged steeps
all precipice and perpendicular rockcovered
and crowded with giant pines, and then come calm
and rippleless lakes, shadowy glens, deep ravines
and twilight dells of strange and dreamy beauty.
There is, in sooth, a stamp of strange and dreamy
beauty impressed upon every ripple of the
Wissahikon
,
every grassy bank extending greenly along
its waters, on every forest-tree towering beside its
shores.
On the calm summer's day, when the sun is
declining
in the broad west, you may look from the
height of some grey, rugged steep, down upon the
depths of the world-hidden waters. Wild legends
wander across your fancy as you gaze; every scene
around you seems but the fitting location for a wild
and dreamy tradition, every rock bears its old time
story, every nook of the wild wood has its tale of
the ancient days. The waters, deep, calm, and
well-like, buried amidst overhanging hills, have a
a strange and mysterious clearness. The long
shadows of the hills, broken by golden belts of
sunshine, clothe the waters in sable and gold, in
glitter and in shadow. All around is quiet and
still; silence seems to have assumed a positive
existence
amid these vallies of romance and of
dreams.
The Lonely House of the Wissahikon.
It was along the borders of this quiet stream,
that an ancient fabric arose, towering through the
verdure of the trees, with its tottering chimneys
enveloped in folds of mist. The walls were severed
by many a fissure, the windows were crumbling
to decay, and the halls of the ancient mansion
were silent as the tomb.
It was wearing toward noon, when a body of
soldiers, wearing the blue hunting-shirt and fur
cap with bucktail plume, came rushing from the
woods on the opposite side of the rivulet, came
rushing through the waters of the lovely stream,
and hurried with hasty steps toward the deserted
house.
In a moment they had entered its tottering
doorway, and disappeared within its aged walls.
Another instant, and a body of soldiers broke from
the woods on the opposite side of the stream, clad
in the Hessian costume, with ponderous bearskin
caps, heavy accoutrements, and massive muskets.
They crossed the stream, and rushed into the
house in pursuit of the flying continentals. They
searched the rooms on the first floor; they hurried
along the tottering timbers, but not a single
Continental
was to be seen. They rushed up the
crumbling
stairway with loud shouts and boisterous oaths,
and reached the rooms of the second story. Every
door was flung hastily aside, every closet was
broken
open, the boards were even torn from the
floor, every nook was searched, every corner
ransacked
,
and yet no vision of a blue shirted
backwoodsman
,
met the eye of the eager Hessians. All
was silent as death. Their own footfalls were
returned
in a thousand echoes, their own shouts
alone disturbed the silence of the house, but no
sound nor sight, could be obtained of the fleeing
Continentals. Every room was now searched,
save the garret, and the Hessians, some twenty
men, able bodied and stout, were about rushing
up the stairway of the attic in pursuit of the ten
Continental soldiers, when the attention of one of
their number was arrested by a singular
spectacle
.
The Hessian soldier beheld through a
crumbling window frame, the figure of a woman,
standing on the height of an abrupt steep,
overhanging
the opposite side of the stream. She
waved her hands to the soldier, shouted and
waved
her hands again. He heeded her not, but
rushed
up the stairway after his companions.
The shout of that unknown woman was the
warning of death.
While the Hessians were busily engaged in
searching the attic, while their shouts and
execrations
awoke the echoes of the roof, while they
were thrusting sword and bayonet into the dark
corners of the apartment, that shout of the woman
on the rock arose, echoing over the stream again
and again.
The Hessians rushed to the window, they
suddenly
remembered that they had neglected to
search the cellar, and looking far below, they
beheld
thin wreaths of light blue smoke, winding
upward from the cellar window.
A fearful suspicion crept over the minds of the
soldiers.
Thay rushed from the attic, in a moment they
might reach the lower floor and escape. With
that feeling of strange terror creeping round each
heart and paling every face they rushed tremblingly
on, they gained the second floor, their footsteps
already
resounded along the stairway when the floor
trembled beneath their feet, a horrid combination
of sounds assailed their ears, and the walls rocked
to and fro like a drunken bacchanal.
Another moment! And along that green wood
rang a fearful sound, louder and more terrible than
thunder, shaking the very earth with an
earthquake
motion, while the fragments of the ancient
fabric arose blackening into the heavens, mingled
with human bodies, torn and scattered into
innumerable
pieces, and the air was filled with a dense
smoke, that hung over the forest, in one thick and
blackening pall.
In a few moments the scene was clear, but the
ancient house had disappeared as if by magic,
while the shouts of the Continental soldiers were
heard in the woods far beyond the scene.
The house had been used by the British as a
temporary
depot
of powder. When the American
Continentals rushed into the cellar, they beheld
the kegs standing in one corner, they piled up
combustible matter in its vicinity and then made
their escape from the house by a subterranean
passage known only to themselves. They
emerged
into open air some hundred yards beyond, and
beheld the result of this signal vengeance on their
foes.
The Crisis of the Fight.
Again we return to the field of Chew's House.
Washington determined to make one last and
desperate effort. The Corps de Reserve under
Stirling, and Maxwell, and Nash, came
thundering
along the field; each sword unsheathed, every
bayonet firm; every man eager and ready for the
encounter.
It was now near 9 o'clock in the morning.
The enemy still retained Chew's House. The
division
under Greene, the main body commanded
by Wayne, by Sullivan and Conway, composed
the American force engaged in actual contest.
To this force was now added the Corps de Reserve,
under Lord Stirling, Generals Maxwell and Nash.
The British force, under command of General
Howe, who had arrived on the field soon after the
onslaught at Chew's House, were led to battle by
Kniphausen, Agnew, Grant and Grey, who now
rode from troop to troop, from rank to rank,
hurrying
the men around toward the main point of
the fight.
There was a pause in the horror of the battle.
The Americans rested on their arms, the
troopers
reined in their steeds in sight of Chew's House,
and amid the bodies of the dead. The
Continental
ranks were terribly thinned by the
desolating
fire from the house, every file was diminished,
and in some instances, whole companies were
swept away. The British were fresh in vigor,
and ably armed and equipped. They impatiently
rushed forward, eager to steep their arms elbow
deep in American blood.
And amid the folds of mist and battle-smoke,
while the whole field resembled some fearful
phantasmagoria
of fancy, with its shadowy figures
flitting
to and fro, while the echo of the cannon, the
rattle of the musketry, and the shrieks of the
wounded yet rung on the soldiers' ears, they
eagerly
awaited the signal for the re-commencement of
the fight.
The Signal of the last Fight.
The signal rang along the lines! In an instant
the cannons opened their fire on Chew's house, the
troopers came thundering on in their hurricane
charge, and all around were charging legions,
armed
bodies of men hurrying toward the house, heaps
of the wounded strown over the sod; while that
terrible cry which had for three long hours gone
shrieking up to heaven from that lawn, now rose
above the tumult of battlethe quick, piercing cry
of the strong man, smitten suddenly down by his
death-wound.
The American soldiers fought like men who
fight for everything that man needs for sustenance,
or holds dear in honor, or sacred in religion. Step
by step the veteran continentals drove the
Britishers
over the field, trampling over the faces of their
dead comrades in the very action; step by step
were they driven back in their turn, musquets
were clubbed in the madness of the strife, and the
cry for quarter, fell on deafened ears.
Then it was that the chieftains of the American
host displayed acts of preternatural daring and
superhuman courage!
The Warrior-Drover.
In the thickest of the fight, where swords
flashed
most fiercely, where death-groans shrieked most
terribly upon the air, where the steeds of
contending
squadrons rushed madly against each other in
the wild encounter of the charge, there might you
see mad Anthony Wayne: his imposing form
towering
over the heads of the combatants, his eye
blazing with excitement, and his sword, all red
with blood, rising and falling like a mighty
hammer
in the hands of a giant blacksmith.
How gallantly the warrior-drover rides! How
keen is the glance of his eye, how unfearing the
waving of his sword, as foe after foe fall shrieking
from their steeds! On and on, without fear,
without
a thought save his country's honor and the
vengeance of Paolion and on he rides, and as
he speeds, his shout rings out clear and lustily
upon the air
On, comrades, onand
Remember Paoli!
Forwarts, brdern, forwarts!
Ha! The gallant Pulaski! How like a king he
rides at the head of his unfearing band, how
firmly
he sits in his stirrups, how gallantly he beckons
his men onward, how like a sunbeam playing on
glittering ice, his sword flits to and fro, along the
darkened air!
Like one solid battle-bolt, his gallant band speed
onward, carrying terror and confusion into the
very centre of Kniphausen's columns, leaving a
line of ghastly dead in their rear, and driving the
discomfitted Hessians before them, while the
well-known
battle-shout of Pulaski halloos these
war-hounds
on to the slaughter.
Forwartsbrudernforwarts!
And there
he
rides, known to all the men as
their commander, seen by every eye in the
intervals
of the battle-smoke, hailed by a thousand
voices; in wild excitement and in terrible anxiety
he rides, cheering the soldiers with his deep-toned
voice, while his eye is fixed upon the varied aspects
of the fight.
A calm and mild-faced man, leading on a column
of Continentals rides up to his side, and is pushing
forward into the terror of the mist-hidden mellay
when the voice of Washington rings in his ear
Greenewhy is Stephens not here? Why
does he delay his division?
General, we have no intelligence of his
movements
.
He has not yet appeared upon the field
Washington's lip quivered. A thousand worlds
seemed pent up in his heart, and for once in
his entire life, his agitation was visible and
apparent
.
He raised his clenched hand on high and as
Napoleon
cursed Grouchy at Waterloo, in after times,
so Washington at Germantown cursed Stephens,
from his very heart of hearts. The glittering game
of battle was being played around him. Stephens
alone was wanting to strike terror into the ranks
of the enemy around Chew's House, the crisis had
come andStephens was not there, one of the
most important divisions of the army was useless.
And now the gallant Stirling, the brave Nash,
and the laurelled Maxwell, came riding on, at the
head of the corps de reserve, every man with his
sword and bayonet, yet unstained with blood,
eager
to join the current of the fight.
Nashthe brave General of the North Carolina
Division, was rushing into the midst of the mellay
with his men, leading them on to deeds of courage
and renown, when he received his death wound
and fell insensible in the arms of one of his
aids-de-camp
.
The Shroud of Death again.
The mist gathering thicker and denser over the
battle field, caused a terrible mistake on the part
of the American divisions. They charged against
their own friends, shot down their own comrades,
and even bayonetted the very soldiers who had
shared their mess, ere they discovered the fatal
mistake. The mist and battle-smoke rendered all
objects dim and indistinctthe event of this
battle
will show, that it was no vain fancy of the
author, which induced him to name this mist of
Germantown
the Shroud of Death
. It proved a
shroud of death, in good sooth, for hundreds
who laid down their lives on the sod of the battle
field.
The gallant Colonel Matthews, at the head of a
Virginia regiment, penetrated into the centre of
the town, driving the British before him at
pleasure
,
and after this glorious effort, he was
returning
to the American lines with some 300
prisoners
,
when he encountered a body of troops in the
mist, whom he supposed to be Continentals. He
rode unfearingly into their midst, and found
himself
a prisoner in the heart of the British army!
The mist had foiled his gallant effort, himself
and his men were captives to the fortune of war,
and his prisoners were recaptured.
That Terrible Word.
Now it was that Washington beheld his soldiers
shrink and give way on every side! On every hand
they began to waver, from line to line, from
column
to column ran terrible rumors of the
approach
of Cornwallis, with a reinforcement of
Grenadiers
,
and the American soldiers were struck
with despair.
They had fought while there was hope, they
had paved their way to victory with heaps of
ghastly dead, they had fought against superior
discipline, superior force, superior fortune, but the
fearful mist, that overhung the battle field,
blasted
all their hopes, and along the American
columns
rang one fearful word, that struck like a
knell of death on the heart of Washington
retreat
RETREAT!
Washington veils his Face in his Hands.
It was all in vain that the American chieftain
threw himself in the way of the retreating ranks
and besought them to stand firmfor the sake of
their honor, for the sake of their country, for the
sake of their God.
It was all in vain! In vain was it that Pulaski
threw his troopers in the path chosen by the
fugitives
;
in vain did he wave his sword on high, and
beseech them in his broken dialect, with a flushed
cheek and a maddening eye, implore them, to turn
and face the well-nigh conquered foe! It was in
vain!
In vain did Mad Anthony Wayne, the hero of
Pennsylvania, ride from rank to rank, and with
his towering form raised to its full height, hold
his hand aloft, and in the familiar tones of
brotherly
intimacy, beckon the soldiers once again
to the field of battle.
All was in vain!
And while Chew's house still belched forth its
fires of death, while all through Germantown were
marching men, hot-foot from Philadelphia, while
over the fatal lawn rushed hurried bands of the
Continentals, seeking for their comrades among
the dead, Washington gazed to the north and
beheld
the columns of Continentals, their array all
thinned and scattered, their numbers diminished,
taking their way along the northern road, calmly
it is true, and in remarkable order, but still in the
order of a retreat, though the enemy showed no
disposition to annoy or pursue them.
And while his heart swelled to bursting, and
his lip was pressed between his teeth in anguish,
Washington bowed his head to the mane of his
gallant grey and veiled his face in his hands, and
then his muscular chest throbbed as though a
mighty tempest were pent up within its confines.
In a moment he raised his face. All was calm
and immoveable, all traces of emotion had passed
away from the stern and commanding features, like
the waves rolling from the rock.
He whispered a few brief words to his
aids-de-camp
,
and then raising his form proudly in the
stirrups, he rode along the Continental columns,
while with a confused and half-suppressed
murmuring
sound, the
Retreat of Germantown
commenced
.
4
Part the fifth.
THE LAST SHOT OF THE BATTLE.
Look forth upon the scene of fight, Gonzales.
The moon is up in the heavensher beams glimmer on the cold faces of the dead. Over dead carcase and
over fallen banner, in the midst of the lawn, arises one fell and ghastly form, towering in the moonbeams
The form, Gonzales?
It is the form of Death, brooding and chuckling over the carnage of the field; he shakes his arms of bone aloft,
his skeleton hands wave in the moonlight, he holds HIGH FESTIVAL OVER THE BODIES OF THE DEAD.
How Goes the Fight?
A pause in the din of battle!
The denizens of Mount Airy and Chesnut Hill
came crowding to their doors and windows, the
hilly streets were occupied by anxious groups of
people, who conversed in low and whispered tones,
with hurried gestures and looks of surprise and
fear. Yonder group who stand clustered in the
roadside!
A grey-haired man with his ear inclined
intently
toward Germantown, his hands outspread, and
his trembling form bent with age. The maiden,
fair-cheeked, red-lipped, and blooming, clad in the
peasant-costume, the tight boddice, the linsey
skirt, the light 'kerchief thrown over the bosom.
Her ear is also inclined toward Germantown, and
her small hands are involuntarily crossed over her
bosom that heaves and throbs into view.
The matron, calm, self-possessed, and placid,
little children clinging to the skirt of her dress,
her wifely cap flung carelessly on her head, with
hair slightly touched with grey, while the sleeping
babe nestles in her bosom.
The boy, with the light flaxen hair, the ruddy
cheeks, the merry blue eye! He stands silent
and motionlesshe also listens!
You stand upon the height of Mount Airy,
it is wearing towards noon, yet gaze around
you.
Above the mist is rising. Here and there an
occasional sun-gleam lights the rolling clouds of
mist, but the atmosphere wears a dull leaden hue,
and the vast horizon a look of solemnity and
gloom.
Beneath and around sweep field and plain,
buckwheat
field, and sombre woods, luxuriant orchards
and fertile vallies, all seen in the intervals of the
white columns of the uprising mist.
The group clustered along the roadside of Mount
Airy are still and silent. Each heart is full,
every ear absorbed in the effort of catching the
slightest sound from Germantown.
The Strange Silence in the Midst of Battle.
There is a strange silence upon the air. A
moment ago and far-off shouts broke on the ear,
mingled with the thunder of cannon and the
shrieks of musquetry, the earth seemed to tremble,
and far around the wide horizon was agitated by a
thousand echoes.
Now the scene is still as midnight. Not a
sound, not a shout, not a distant hurrah. The
anxiety of the group upon the hill becomes
absorbing
and painful. Looks of wonder at the sudden
pause in the battle flit from face to face, and then
low whispers are heard, and then comes another
moment of fearful suspense.
It is followed by a wild rushing sound to the
south, like the shrieks of the ocean waves, as they
fill the hold of the foundering ship, while it sinks
far in the loneliness of the seas.
Then a pause, and again that unknown sound,
and then the tramp of ten thousand footsteps,
mingled with a wild and indistinct murmur.
Tramp, tramp, tramp, the air is filled with the
sound, and then distinct voices break upon the
air, and the clatter is borne on the breeze.
The Soldier and His Burden.
The boy turns to his mother, and asks her who
has gained the day? Every heart feels vividly
that the battle is now over, that the account of
blood is near its close, that the appeal to the God
of battles has been made.
The mother turns her tearful eyes to the south
she cannot answer the question. The old man,
awaking from a reverie, turns suddenly to the
maiden, and clasps her arm with his trembling
hands. His lips move, but his tongue is unable to
syllable a sound. His suspense is fearful. He
flings a trembling hand southward, and speaks his
question with the gesture of age.
The battle, the battle, how goes the battle?
And as he makes the gesture, the figure of a
soldier is seen rushing from the mist in the valley
below, he comes speeding round the bend of the
road, he ascends the hill, but his steps totter,
and he staggers to and fro like a drunken man.
He bears a burden on his shouldersis it the
plunder of the fight, is it spoil gathered from the
ranks of the dead?
Nono. He bears an aged man on his
shoulders
,
he grasps the aged form with his trembling
arms, and with an unsteady step nears the group
on the hill-top.
The old man's grey hairs are waving in the
breeze, and his extended hand grasps a broken
bayonet, which he raises on high with a maniac
gesture.
The soldier and the veteran he bears upon his
shoulders, are clad in the blue hunting shirt, torn
and tattered and stained with blood, it is true, but
still you can recognize the uniform of the
Revolution
.
The tottering soldier nears the group, he lays
the aged veteran down by the roadside, and then
looks around with a ghastly face and a rolling eye.
There is blood dripping from his attire, his face is
begrimed with powder, and spotted with crimson
drops. He glances wildly around, and then
kneeling
on the sod he takes the hands of the aged man
in his own, and raises his head upon his knee.
The battle, the battle, how goes the battle?
The group cluster round as they shriek the
question.
The young Continental makes no reply, but
gazing upon the face of the dying veteran, wipes
the beaded drops of blood from his forehead.
Wipe the blood from my eyes, comrade.
Comrade, shrieks the veteran, raise me on
my feet, and wipe the blood from my eyes. I
would see him once again!
He is raised upon his feet, the blood is wiped
from his eyes.
I seeI seeit is heit is Washington!
YonderyonderI see his swordand Antony
Wayne,raise me higher, comrade,all is getting
darkI would seeMad Antony!
Did you ever see a picture that made your heart
throb and your eyes grow blind with tears?
Here is one.
The roadside, the group clustered in front of
Allen's House, which rises massive and solemn in
the background. The young soldier, all weak and
trembling from loss of blood, raising the
grey-haired
veteran in his arms, placing his face toward
Germantown, while the wrinkled features light up
with a sudden gleam, and waving his broken
bayonet
before his eyes, he looks toward the sence of
the late fight.
The bystanders, spectators of this scene. The
matron gazing anxiously upon the old man's face,
her eyes swimming in tears, the ruddy-cheeked boy
holding one hand of the dying veteran, the
youthful
maiden, all blossom and innocence, standing
slightly apart, with the ancient man in peasant's
attire, gazing vacantly around as he grasps her
arm.
Lift me, comradehigher, higherI see him
I see Mad Antony! Wipe the blood from my
eyes, comrade, for it darkens my sightit is dark,
it is dark!
And the young soldier held in his arms a
lifeless
corse. The old veteran was dead. He had
fought his last fight, fired his last shot, shouted
the name of Mad Antony for the last time, and
yet his withered hand clenched, with the tightness
of death, the broken bayonet.
The battle, the battle, how goes the battle?
As the thrilling question again rung in his ears
the young Continental turned to the group, smiled
ghastily and then flung his wounded arm to the
south.
Lost!
he shrieked, and rushed on his way
like one bereft of his senses. He had not gone
ten steps, when he bit the dust of the roadside, and
lay extended in the face of day a lifeless corse.
The eyes of the group were now fixed upon the
valley below.
The Terror of the Retreat.
Tramp, tramp, echoed the sound of hoofs, and
then a steed, caparisoned in battle array, came
sweeping up the hill, with his wounded rider
hanging helpless and faint by the saddle-bow.
Then came another steed, speeding up the hill,
with bloodshot eye and quivering nostril, while
his rider fell dying to the earth, shouting his wild
hurrah as he fell.
Then came baggage wagons, then bodies of
flying troops in continental attire turned the bend
of the road in the valley below, and like a flash the
hillside of Mount Airy was all alive with
disordered
masses of armed men, rushing onward with
hurried steps and broken arms.
Another moment! The whole array of the
continental army comes sweeping round the bend
of the road, file after file, rank after rank, and now
a column breaks into sight.
Alone the whole column, no vision meets the
eyes of the group, but the spectacle of broken arms,
tarnished array, men wearied with toil and thirst,
fainting with wounds, and tottering with the loss
of blood.
On and on, along the ascent of the hill they
rush, some looking hastily around with their pallid
faces stained with blood, some holding their
shattered
arms high over head, others aiding their
wounded comrades as they hurry on in the
current
of the retreat, while waving in the air, the
blue banner of the continental host, with its array
of thirteen stars, droops heavily from the
flagstaff
,
as its torn folds come sweeping into light.
And from file to file, with a wild movement and
a reckless air, rode a tall and muscular soldier clad
in the uniform of a general officer, his sword
waving
aloft and his voice heard above the hurry and
confusion of the retreat
Turn, comrades, turn and face the Britisher
turn, and the day is ours!
Mad Antony cried in vain! The panic had gone
like a lightning flash through the army, and every
man hurried on, without a thought save the
thought of retreat, without a motive save the
escape
from the fatal field of Chew's House.
Pulaski, Sullivan, and Greene.
Then came Pulaski and his veterans, their
costumes
of white extending along the road, in glaring
relief against the background of blue-shirted
continentals
;
then came the columns of Sullivan, the
division of Greene, and then huddled together in
a confused crowd came the disordered bands of
the army, who had broken their ranks, and were
marching beside the baggage wains loaded to the
very sides with wounded and dying.
The Train of Death-Cars.
It was a sad and ghastly spectacle to see that
train of death-cars, rolling heavily on, with the
carcases of the wounded hanging over their sides,
with broken arms and limbs protruding from their
confines, with pallid faces upturned to the sky,
while amid the hurry and motion of the retreat,
piteous moans, fierce cries, and convulsive
death-shrieks
broke terribly on the air.
Yon gallant officer leaning from his steed, yon
gallant officer, with the bared forehead, the
disordered
dress, the ruffle spotted with blood, the
coat torn by sword thrusts, and dripping with the
crimson current flowing from the heart, while an
aid-de-camp riding by his side supports his
fainting
form on his steed, urging the noble animal
forward in the path of the retreat.
It is the brave General Nash. He has fought
his last fight, led his gallant North Carolinians on
to the field for the last time, his heart is fluttering
with the trembling pulsation of death, and his eyes
swimming in the dimness of coming dissolution.
The Last Look at the Field.
In the rear, casting fierce glances toward
Germantown
,
rides the tall form of Washington, with
Pickering and Hamilton and Marshall clustering
round their chieftain, while the sound of the re
treating legions is heard far in the distance, along
the heights of Chesnut Hill.
Washington reaches the summit of Mount Airy,
he beholds his gallant though unfortunate army
sweeping far ahead, he reins his steed for a
moment
on the height of the mount and looks
toward the field of Germantown!
One long look toward the scene of the hard
fought fight, one quick and fearful memory of the
unburied dead, one half-smothered exclamation of
anguish, and the chieftain's steed springs forward,
and thus progresses the retreat of Germantown.
Germantown Again!
In the town the scene is wild and varied. The
mist has not yet arisen, the startled inhabitants
have not crept from their places of concealment,
and through the village ride scattered bands and
regiments of the British army. Here a party of
gaudily-clad German troopers of Walbeck break
on your eye, yonder the solemn and ponderous
Hessian in his heavy accoutrements crosses your
path, here a company of plaid-kilted Highlanders
came marching on, with claymore and bag-pipe,
and yonder, far in the distance sweep the troopers
of Anspack, in their costume of midnight
darkness
,
relieved by ornaments of gold, with the skull
and cross-bones engraven on each sable cap.
The Brave Captain Lee.
In the centre of the village extended a level
piece of ground, surrounded by dwelling houses,
stretching from the eastern side of the road, with
the market-house, a massive and picturesque
structure
,
arising on one side, while the German
Reformed
Church, with its venerable front and
steeple
,
arose on the other.
The gallant Captain Lee, of the Partizan
Rangers
,
had penetrated thus far into the town, in
common with many other companies of the army,
but soon all others retreated, and he was left alone
in the heart of the British army, while the
continentals
were retreating over Mount Airy and
Chesnut Hill.
Lee had pursued a Hanoverian troop as far as
the market-house, when he suddenly perceived the
red-coated soldiers of Cornwallis breaking from
the gloom of the mist on the south, while a body
of troopers came rushing from the school-house
lane on one side, and another corps came
thundering
from the church lane on the opposite side.
Lee was surrounded. The sable-coated troopers
whom he had been pursuing, now turned on their
pursuers,and escape seemed impossible. The brave
Partizan turned to his men. Each swarthy face
gleamed with delighteach sunburnt hand flung
aloft the battle-dented sword. The confusion and
havoc of the day had left the Partizan but forty
troopers, but every manly form was marked by
wide shoulders, muscular chest, and lofty bearing;
and their uniform of green, their caps of fur, with
buck-tail plume, gave a striking and effective
appearance
to the band.
Comrades, now for a chase! shouted Lee,
glancing gaily over his men. Let us give these
scare-crow hirelings a chase! Up the Germantown
road, advance, boysforward!
The Chase.
And as they galloped along the Germantown
road, riding gallantly four abreast, in all a
warrior's
port and pride, the Hanoverians, now two
hundred strong, came thundering in their rear,
each dark-coated trooper leaning over the neck of
his steed, with sword upraised, and with fierce
battle shout cehoing from lip to lip.
Only twenty paces lay between the Rangers and
their foes. The monotonous sound of the
pattering
hoof, the clank of the scabbard against the
soldier's booted leg, the deep, hard breathing of
the horses, urged by boot and spur to their utmost
speed, the fierce looks of the Hanoverians, their
bending figures, their dress of deep black, with
relief
of gold, the ponderous caps, ornamented with
the fearful insignia of skull and cross-bone, the
Rangers sweeping gallantly in front, square, and
compact in their solid column, each manly form
in costume of green and gold, disclosed in the
light, in all its muscular ability and imposing
proportions
,
as they moved forward with the same
quick impulse, all combined, form a scene of
strange and varying interest, peculiar to those
times of Revolutionary peril and bloodshed.
The chase became exciting. The advance
company of sable coated troopers gained on Lee's
gallant band at every step, and at every step they
left their comrades further in the rear.
Lee's men spurred their steeds merrily forward,
ringing their boisterous shouts tauntingly upon
the air, while their exasperated foes replied with
curses and execrations.
And all along through the streets of
Germantown
lay the scene of this exciting chase, the
clatter
of the horses' hoofs a wake the echoes of the
ancient
house, bringing the frightened denizens
suddenly
to the doors and windows, and the pursuers
and pursued began to near the hill of the Menno
nist grave-yard, while the peril of Lee became
more imminent and apparent. The Hanoverians
were at the horses' heels of the Rangersthey
were gaining upon them at every step; in a
moment
they would be surrounded and cut to pieces.
The Crisis.
Lee glanced over his shoulder. He saw his
danger at a glance; they were now riding up the
hill, the advance company of the enemy were in
his rear, the main division were some hundred
yards behind. In a moment the quick word of
command rung from his lips, and at the instant,
as the whole corps attained the summit of the hill,
his men wheeled suddenly round, faced the
pursuing
enemy, and came thundering upon their
ranks like an earth-riven thunderbolt!
Another moment! and the discomfitted
Hanoverians
lay scattered and bleeding along the
roadside
;
here a steed was thrown back upon his
haunches, crushing its rider as it fell; here was a
trooper clinging with the grasp of death to his
horse's neck; yonder reared another horse
without
its rider, and the ground was littered with the
overthrown and wounded troopers.
The Charge.
They swept over the black-coated troopers like
a thunderbolt, and in another instant the gallant
Rangers wheeled about, returning in their charge
of terror with the fleetness of the wind, each man
sabreing an enemy as he rode, and then, with a wild
hurrah, they regained the summit of the hill.
Lee drew his trooper's cap from his head, his
men did the same, and then, with their eyes fixed
upon the main body of the enemy advancing along
the foot of the hill, the gallant Rangers sent up a
wild hurrah of triumph, waving their caps above
their heads, and brandishing their swords.
The enemy returned a yell of execration, but
ere they reached the summit of the hill, Lee's
company were some hundred yards ahead, and all
pursuit was vain. The Rangers rode fearlessly
forward, and, ere an half-hour was passed,
regained
the columns of the retreating army.
Sunset upon the Battle-field.
It was sunset upon the field of battlesolemn
and quiet sunset. The rich, golden light fell over
the grassy lawn, over the venerable fabric of
Chew's house, and over the trees scattered along
the field, turning their autumnal foliage to
quivering
gold.
The scene was full of the spirit of desolation,
steeped in death, and crimsoned in blood. The
green lawnwith the soil turned up by the
cannon
wheels, by the tramp of war steeds, by the
rush of the foemenwas all heaped with ghastly
piles of dead, whose cold upturned faces shone
with a terrible lustre in the last beams of the
declining
sun.
There were senseless carcasses, with the arms
rent from the shattered body, with the eyes
scooped
from the hollow sockets, with foreheads
severed
by the sword thrust, with hair dabbled in blood,
with sunken jaws fallen on the gory chest; there
was all the horror, all the bloodshed, all the
butchery
of war, without a single gleam of its romance
or chivalry.
Here a plaid-kilted Highlander, a dark-coated
Hanoverian, were huddled together in the
ghastliness
of sudden death; each with that fearful red
wound denting the forehead, each with that same
repulsive expression of convulsive pain, while their
unclosed eyes, cold, dead, and lustreless, glared on
the blue heavens with the glare of death.
Yonder, at the foot of a giant elm, a continental,
strong armed and stout, sunk down in the grasp
of death. His head is sunken on his breast, his
white hair all blood-bedabbled, his blue hunting
shirt is spotted with clotted drops of purple. The
sunburnt hand extended, grasps the unfailing rifle
the old warrior is merry even in death, for his
lip wears a cold and unmoving smile.
Silence and Death.
A little farther on a peasant boy bites the sod,
with his sunburnt face half buried in the
blood-soddened
earth, his rustic attire of linsey tinted by
the last beams of the declining sun; one arm
convulsively
gathered under his head, the long brown
hair all stiffened with blood, while the other grasps
the well-used fowling piece, with which he rushed
to the field, fought bravely, and died like a hero.
The fowling piece is with him in death; the
fowling
piececompanion of many a boyish ramble
beside the Wissahikon, many a hunting
excursion
on the wild and dreamy hills that frown
around that rivuletis now beside him, but the
hand that encloses its stock, is colder than the iron
of its rusted tube.
Let us hie over the field, with a soft and solemn
footstep, for our path is yet stamped with the
recent
footsteps of death, and the ghosts of the
heroes
are thronging in the invisible air of the fight.
Chew's house is silent and still. The shattered
windows, the broken hall door, the splintered roof,
the battered chimneys, and the walls of the house
stained with blood: all are silent, yet terrible
proofs of the havoc and ruin of the fight.
Silence is within Chew's house. No
death-shriek
,
no groan of agony, no voice shrieking to
the uplifted sword to spare and pity, breaks upon
the air. All is still and solemn, and the eye of
human vision may not pierce the gloom of the
unknown
,
and behold the ghosts of the slain
crowding
before the throne of God.
The sun is setting over Chew's lawn and house,
the soldiers of the British army have deserted the
place, and as the last beams of day quiver over the
field, deathterrible and fearful deathbroods
over the scene, in all its ghastliness and horror.
The Legend of General Agnew again.
Along the solitary streets of Germantown, as
the sun went down, rang the echo of horses' hoofs,
and the form of the rider of a gallant war steed
was seen, disclosed in the last beams of the dying
day, as he took his way along the village road.
The horseman was tall, well-formed, and
muscular
in proportion; his hair was slightly touched
with the frost of age, and his eye was wild and
wandering in its glance. The compressed lip,
the hollow cheek, the flashing eye, all told a story
of powerful, through suppressed emotion, stirring
the warrior's heart to bitter thoughts and gloomy
memories.
It was General Agnew, of the British army: he
had fought bravely in the fight of Chew's house,
though the presentiment sat heavy on his soul; he
had fought bravely, escaped without a wound, and
now was riding alone, along the solitary street,
toward the Mnist grave-yard.
There was an expression on his commanding
face that it would have chilled your heart to see.
It was an expression which stamped his features
with a look of doom and fate, which revealed the
inward throbbings of his soul, as the dark
presentiment
of the morning moved over its shadowy
depths.
He may have been thinking of his home, away
in the fair valleys of Englandof the blooming
daughter, the bright-eyed boy, or the matronly
wife; and then a thought of the terrible wrong
involved
in the British cause may have crossed his
soul, for the carnage of Chew's lawn had been
most fearful, and it is not well to slay hundreds of
living beings like ourselves, for the shadow of a
right.
The Last Look at the Setting Sun.
He reached the point where the road sweeps
down the hill, in front of the grave-yard, and as
he rode slowly down the ascent, his attention was
arrested by a singular spectacle.
The head of a man, grey-bearded and
grey-haired
,
was thrust above the grave-yard wall, and
a fierce, malignant eye met the gaze of General
Agnew. It was the strange old man who, in the
morning, had asked whether that was General
Grey? pointing to the person of Agnew as he
spoke, and being answered, by mistake or design,
in the affirmative, fired a rifle at the officer from
the shelter of the wall.
No sooner had the wild face rose above the wall
than it suddenly disappeared, and, scarce noting
the circumstance, the General reined his steed for
a moment, on the descent of the hill, and gazed
toward the western sky, where the setting sun was
sinking behind a rainbow-hued pile of clouds, all
brilliant with a thousand contrasted lights.
The last beams of the sun trembled over the
high forehead of General Agnew, as, with his back
turned to the grave-yard wall, he gazed upon the
prospect, and his eye lit up with a sudden
brilliancy
,
when the quick and piercing report of a rifle
broke on the air, and echoed around the scene.
A small cloud of light blue smoke wound upward
from the grave-yard wall, a ghastly smile
overspread
the face of Agnew, he looked wildly round
for a single instant, and then fell heavily ts the
dust of the road-sidea lifeless corse.
His gallant steed of ebon darkness of skin,
lowered
his proud crest, and thrust his nostrils in his
master's face, his large eyes dilating, as he snuffed
the scent of blood upon the air; and at the very
instant, that same wild and ghastly face was
thrust above the stones of the grave-yard wall, and
a shriek of triumph, wilder and ghastlier than the
face, arose shrieking above the graves.
That rifle shot, pealing from the grave-yard
wall, was the LAST SHOT of the battle-day of
Germantown
;
and that corse flung along the
roadside
,
with those cold eyes glaring on the blue
sunset
sky, with the death-wound near the heart, was
the LAST DEAD MAN of that day of horror.
Part the Sixth.
THE FUNERAL OF THE DEAD.
Blessed are the dead that die in the Lord, for they rest from their labors, and their works do follow them.
An Ancient Church.
In the township of Towamensing, some
twenty-six
miles from Philadelphia, from the green sward
of a quiet grave-yard, arises the venerable walls of
an ancient church, under whose peaceful roof
worship
the believers in the Menonist faith, as their
fathers worshipped before them.
The grave-yard, with its mounds of green sod,
is encircled by a massive wall of stone,
overshadowed
by a grove of primitive oaks, whose giant
trunks and gnarled branches, as they tower in the
blue summer sky, seem to share in the sacred
stillness and ancient grandeur which rests like a
holy spell upon the temple and the hamlet of the
dead.
Come back with me, reader, once more come
back to the ancient revolutionary time. Come
back to the solemnity and gloom of the funeral of
the dead; and in the quiet grave-yard we will
behold
the scene.
The Coffins beside the Grave.
Bands of armed men throng the place of graves;
on every side you behold figures of stout men,
clad in the uniform of war; on every side you
behold
stern and scarred visages, and all along the
green sward, with its encircling grove of oaks,
the pomp of banners wave flauntingly in the
evening
air, but no glittering bayonet gleams in the
light of the declining day. The banners are
heavy with folds of crape, the bayonets are
unfixed
from each musquet, and every soldier carries
his arms reversed.
Near the centre of the ground, hard by the
roadside
,
are dug four graves, the upturned earth
forming
a mound beside each grave, and the sunbeams
shine upon four coffins, hewn out of rough pine
wood, and laid upon trussels, with the faces of the
dead cold and colorless, tinted with a ghastly
gleam of the golden sunlight.
Around the graves are grouped the chieftains
of the American army, each manly brow
uncovered
,
each manly arm wearing the solemn scarf
of crape, while an expression of deep and
overwhelming
grief is stamped upon the lines of each
expressive face.
Washington stands near the coffins: his eyes
are downcast, and his lip is compressed. Wayne
is by his side, his bluff countenance marked by
unfeigned sorrow; and there stands Greene and
Sullivan, and Maxwell and Armstrong, clustered
in the same group with Stirling and Forman, with
Smallwood and Knox. Standing near the coffin's
head, a tall and imposing form, clad in a
white-hued
uniform, is disclosed in the full light of the
sunbeams. The face, with the whiskered lip and
the eagle eye, wears the same expression of
sorrow
that you behold on the faces of all around. It
is the Count Pulaski.
These are the pall-bearers of the dead.
And in the rear of this imposing group sweep
the columns of the American army, each officer
with his sword reversed, each musquet also
reversed
,
while all around is silent and still.
The Dead of Germantown.
A grey-haired man, tall and imposing in stature
advances from the group of pall-bearers. He is
clad in the robes of the minister of heaven, his face
is marked by lines of care and thought, and his
calm eye is expressive of a mind at peace with
God and man. He stands disclosed in the full
glow of the sunbeams, and while his long grey
hairs wave in the evening air, he gazes upon the
faces of the dead.
The first corse, resting in the pine coffin, with
the banner of blue and stars sweeping over its
rough surface, and bearing upon its folds the
sword and chapeau of a general officer, is the
corse of General Nash. The noble features are
white as marble, the eyes are closed, and the lip
wears the smile of death.
The next corse, with the sword and chapeau of
the commanding officer of a regiment, is the corse
of the brave Colonel Boyd.
Then comes the corse of Major White,
handsome
and dignified even in death. The finely
chisseled features, the arched brows, the Roman
nose, and compressed lip, look like the marble of
a statue.
The last corse, the corse of a young man, with
a lieutenant's sword and cap placed on the coffin,
is the last remains of the gallant Virginian, who
bore the flag of truce to Chew's house, and was
shot down in the act. Lieutenant Smith rests
in death, and the blood-stained flag of truce is
placed over his heart.
The venerable minister advances, he gazes upon
the faces of the dead, his clear and solemn voice
breaks out in tones of impassioned eloquence in this.
FUNERAL SERMON OVER THE DEAD.
[5]
[5]
Note
. The author deems it necessary to state,
once for all, that all the legends given in this
chronicle, are derived from substantial fact or oral
tradition. The legend of the Debauch of Death
the old Quakerthe House on the Wissahikon
the escape of Washingtonthe presentiment
and death of General Agnewthe feat of Captain
Leeas well as all other incidents are derived
from oral tradition. In other points, the history
of the Battle is followed as laid down by Marshall
and his contemporaries. To the accomplished
scholar and antiquary, John F. Watson, Esq., of
Germantown, the author acknowledges himself
indebted for various interesting traditions and
incidents of the time, gleaned from the forthcoming
second edition of his celebrated Annals. The
engravings
accompanying this chronicle, are copied
by permission from the two elegant engravings
illustrating the new edition of Watson's Annals.
This work will ereate a great sensation. There
is some doubt concerning the name of the preacher
who delivered the funeral sermon. But with
regard
to the funeral ceremonies at the Mennonist
church at Toyamensing, there can be no doubt.
General Nash and his companions in death were
buried with the honors of war, in presence of the
whole army the day after the battle.
General Nash, Colonel Boyd, Major White,
and Lientenant Smith: buried in
Towamensing
Mennonist Grave-yard, the day
after the Battle of Germantown.
Blessed are the dead that die in the Lord,
for they rest from their labors, and their
works do follow them
.
Soldiers and Countrymen:Our brethren lay
before us in all the solemnity of death. Their
eyes are closed, their lips are vioceless; life, with
its hurry and turmoil, its hopes and its fears, with
them is over forever. They have passed from
among us, amid the smoke and glare of battle they
passed away; and now, in this solemn grove,
amid the silence and quiet of the evening hour,
we have assembled to celebrate their funeral
obsequies
.
Brethren, look well upon the corses of the dead,
mark the eyes hollowed by decay, the cheeks
sunken, and the lips livid with the touch of death;
look upon these forms, but one short day ago
moving and throbbing with the warm blood of
life, and now cold, clammy, dead, senseless remains
of clay.
But this is not all, brethren; for as we look
upon these corses, the solemn words of the book
break on our ear, through the silence of the
evening
air:
Blessed are the dead that die in the Lord, for
they rest from their labors, and their works do
follow them
.
For they did die in the Lord, my brethren.
Fighting in the holiest cause, fighting against
wrong, and might, and violence, the brave Nash
rode into the ranks of battle, and while the bullets
of the hirelings whistled around him, while all
was terror and gloom, he fell at the head of his
men, bravely flashing his sword for his
fatherland
.
So fell White, and so fell Boyd; you have all
heard how Lieutenant Smith met his death. You
have heard how he went forth on the battle morn
with the flag of truce in his hand. You have
heard how he approached the fatal mansion on the
battle-field; you have heard how these merciless
men pointed their musquets at his heart, and he
fell, bathing the flag of truce with the warm blood
of his heart.
They fell, but their blood shall not fall
unheeded
.
George of Brunswick may augur success to
his cause from the result of this fight, but the
weak and mistaken man shall soon know his
delusion
false.
From every drop of patriot blood sinking in
the sod of Germantown, a hero shall arise! From
the darkness and death of that terrible fight, I see
the angel of our country's freedom springing into
birth; beyond the clouds and smoke of battle, I
beheld the dawning of a brighter and more
glorious
day.
They rest from their labors. From the
toil-some
labor of the night march, from the fierce
labor
of the battle charge, from the labor of
bloodshed
and death they rest.
They will no more share the stern joy of the
meeting of congregated armies; no more ride the
steed to battle; no more feel their hearts throb at
the sound of the trumpet. All is over.
They rest from their labors! Aye, in the
solemn
courts of heaven they rest from their labors,
and the immortal great of the past greet them
with smiles and beckonings of joy, their hearts
are soothed by the hymnings of angels, and the
voice of the Eternal bids them welcome.
From the dead let me turn to the living.
Let me speak for a moment to the men of the
gallant band; let me tell them that God will fight
for them; that though the battle may be fierce
and bloody, still the sword of the Unknown will
glisten on the side of the freemen-brothers; that
though the battle clouds may roll their shadows
of gloom over heaps of dying and dead, yet from
those very clouds will spring the day of Freedom,
from the very carnage of the battle-field will bloom
the fruits of a peaceful land.
Man, chosen among men, as the leader of
freemen
,
I speak to thee! And as the prophets of
old, standing on the ramparts of Israel, raised their
hands, and blessed the Hebrew chieftains as they
went forth to battle, so now I bless thee, and bless
thy doings; by the graves of the slain, and by
the corses of the patriot dead, I sanctify thy arms,
in the name of that God who never yet beheld
fearful wrong without sudden vengeancein the
name of that Redeemer whose mission was joy to
the captive, freedom to the slave, I bless thee,
Washington
.
On, onin thy career of glory!
Not the glory of bloodshed, not the halo that is
born of the phosphorescent light hovering around
the carcasses of the dead, not the empty fame o
human slaughter. Nono.
The glory of a pure soul, actuated by one
motive
of good, straining every purpose of heart to
accomplish that motive; neither heeding the
threats of the merciless tyrant, on the one hand,
or the calls of ambition on the other, but speeding
forward, with sure and steady steps, to the goal
of all thy hopesthe freedom of this land of the
new world.
Such is thy glory, Washington.
On, then, ye gallant men, on, in your career
of glory. To day all may be dark; all may be
sad, all may be steeped in gloom. You may be
driven from one battle-field, you may behold your
comrades fall wounded and dying in the path of
your retreat. Carnage may thin your ranks,
decease
walk through your tents, death track your
footsteps.
But the bright day will come at last. The
treasure
of blood will find its recompense, the courage,
the self-denial and daring of this time will work
out the certain reward of the country's freedom.
Then behold the fruits of your labours.
A land of mighty rivers, colossal mountains, a
land of luxurious vallies, fertile plains, a land of
freeman, peopled by happy multitudes of millions
whose temples echo with hosannas to God, whose
5
praises repeat your names, gallant survivors of
the battle field of Germantown.
Their Works do follow them.
Yesyes. From the Eternal world, our
departed
friends shall look down upon the fruit of
their works. From the Vast Unseen they shall
look down upon your banner of blue as the
sun-gleam
of victory glitters on its stars. They shall
behold the skeletons of the invader strewing our
shores, his banners trailed in the dust, his armies
annihilated, his strong men overthrown, and the
temple of his power, toppled from its strong
foundations
.
They rest from their labours.
Oh, glorious is their resting place, oh, most
glorious is their home! As they flee on
spirit-wings
to their eternal abode, the ghosts of the
mighty-dead, come crowding to the portals of the
Unknown, and hail them welcome home!
Brutus
of old is there, shaking his gory dagger
aloft, Hampden and Sidney are there, and there
are the patriot martyrs from all the scaffolds of
oppressed Europe, each mighty spirit sounding a
welcome to the martyrs of New World freedom.
The dead of Bunker Hill are there, the form of
Warren is among the first in the mighty crowd,
and there, raising their gory hands on high, a
band of the martyred men of Brandywine, press
forward, and hail their compeers of Germantown
a welcome home.
Blessed are the dead who die in the Lord.
Oh! thrice blessed, oh! blessed on the tongues
of nations, blessed in the hymns of little children,
blessed in the tears of woman, shed for their
martyrdom
;
blessed in the world beyond, forever and
forever blessed.
Farewell to ye, mighty dead, on earth! The
kind hands of wife or child were not passed over
your brows, when the big drops of the death-dew
announced the approach of the last enemy of man!
No blooming child, no soft-voiced wife, no
fair-haired
boy was near ye.
Alone ye died. Alone amid the ranks of battle,
or ere the battle shout had yet ceased to echo on
your ear. Alone, with fever in your brain, with
fever in your hearts, with maddening throes of
pain, forcing from your manly lips the involuntary
cry of pain, yet, with your native land uppermost
in your thoughts, ye died.
And now, brethren, the sun sinking in the
west, warns me to close. The bright golden beams
tint the tops of the trees, and fling a shower of
light over the roof of the ancient church. The
sky above arches calm and azure, as though the
spirits of the dead smiled from yon clime upon
our solemn ceremonies. The hour is still and
solemn, and all nature invites us to the offering of
prayer. Let us pray.
Prayer for the Dead.
Father in Heaven, we bow before thee, under
the temple of the clear blue sky and within the
shadow of you oaken grove, we bow beside the
corses of the dead. Our hearts are sad, our
souls are awed. Up to thy throne we send our
earnest prayers for this, our much-afflicted land.
Turn, oh! God, turn the burning sword from
between
us and the sun of thy countenance. Lift
the shadow of death from our land. And, as in
the olden times, thou didst save the oppressed,
even when the blood-stained grasp of wrong was
at their throats, so save thou us, nowoh, most
merciful God!
And if the voice of prayer is ever heard in thy
courts, for the spirits of the dead, then let our
voices now plead with thee, for the ghosts of the
slain, as they crowd around the portals of the
Unseen
world.
Oh! Lord God, look into our hearts, and there
behold every pulse throbbing, every vein filling
with one desire, which we now send up to thee,
with hands and soul upraisedthe desire of
freedom
for this fair land.
Give us success in this our most holy cause.
In the name of the martyred dead of the past, in
the name of that shadowy band, whose life-blood
dyes a thousand seaffolds, give us freedom.
In the name of Jesus give us peace! Make
strong the hands of thy servant even George
Washington. Make strong the hearts of his
counsellors
,
stir them up to greater deeds even than
the deeds they have already done, let thy presence
be with our host, a pillar of cloud by day and a
pillar of fire by night.
And at last, when our calling shall have been
fulfilled, when we have done and suffered thy will
here below, receive us into the Rest of the Blessed.
So shall it be said of us
Blessed are the dead that die in the Lord,
for they rest from their labors, and their
works do follow them!
The last words of the preacher, sank into the
hearts of his hearers. Every man felt awed, every
soul was thrilled.
The preacher made a sign to the group of
war-worn
soldiers in attendance at the head of the
graves. The coffins were lowered in their
receptacles
of death. The man of God advanced,
and took a handfull of earth, from one of the
up-rising
mounds.
There was universal silence around the graves,
and thro' the grave-yard.
Earth to earth, ashes to ashes, dust to dust
.
The sound of the earth rattling on the coffin of
General Nash, broke with a strange echo on the
air.
Slowly along the sod, passed the minister of
heaven speaking the solemn words of the last
ceremony
,
as he flung the handful of earth upon each
coffin.
A single moment passed, and a file of soldiers,
with upraised musquets, extended along the graves.
The word of command rang out upon the air, and
the shot after shot, the alternating reports of the
musquets, broke like thunder over the graves of
the laurelled dead.
The soldiers suddenly swept aside, and in a
moment, a glittering cannon was wheeled near
the graves, with the cannonier standing with the
lighted linstock, by its side. The subdued word of
command again was heard, the earthquake
thunder
of the cannon shook the graveyard, and like a
pall for the mighty dead, the thick folds of smoke,
waved heavily above the grave.
Again did the file of musquetry pour forth the
fire, again did the cannons send forth their flame,
flashing down into the very graves of the dead,
while the old church walls gave back the echo.
Again was the ceremony repeated, and as the thick
folds of cannon-smoke waved overhead, the soldiers
opened to the right and left, and the pall-bearers
of the dead advanced.
They advanced, and one by one looked into the
graves of the slain.
This was the scene when Washington looked
for the last time into the grave of Nash and his
death-mates.
The sun setting behind the grove of oaks threw
a veil of sunshine over the masses of armed men
thronging the grave-yard, over the reversed arms,
and craped banner of blue and stars. The form
of Washington, standing at the head of the grave,
was disclosed in all its majesty of proportion, his
face impressed with an expression of sorrow, and
his right hand reversing his craped sword; Wayne
the gallant, the noble, the fearless Wayne
stood at his right shoulder, and then sweeping in
a line along the graves, extended the chieftains of
the army, each face stamped with grief, each
right arm holding the reversed sword: there was
the sagacious face of Greene, the bluff visage of
Knox, the commanding features of Sullivan, the
manly countenances of Maxwell, Stirling, Forman,
Conway, and the other officers of the continental
host. All were grouped there beside the graves
of the slain, and as every eye was fixed upon the
coffins sprinkled with earth, a low, solemn peal of
music floated along the air, and a veteran
advancing
to the grave, flung to the wind the broad
banner
of blue and stars, and the last glimpse of
sun-light
fell upon this solemn relic of the
Battle=Day of Germantown.
THE END.